NATIONAL  IMPERATIVES  FOR  EARTH 

SCIENCE  RESEARCH 

S.  HRG.  110–1196 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, AND 

RELATED SCIENCES 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MARCH  7,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

78–568 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director,  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director,  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SPACE,  AERONAUTICS,  AND  RELATED  SCIENCES 

BILL  NELSON,  Florida,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi, 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on March 7, 2007  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Brown,  Ph.D.,  Otis  D.,  Dean,  Rosenstiel  School  of  Marine  and  Atmospheric 
Science,  University  of  Miami;  Member,  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and 
Applications  from  Space,  National  Research  Council,  The  National  Acad-
.....................................................................................................................
emies 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Colleton,  Nancy,  President,  Institute  for  Global  Environmental  Strategies; 
Executive Director, Alliance for Earth Observations  ........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Freilich,  Dr.  Michael  H.,  Director,  Earth  Science  Division,  Science  Mission 
Directorate, National Aeronautics and Space Administration  .........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Moore  III,  Ph.D.,  Berrien,  Distinguished  Professor  and  Director,  Institute 
for  the  Study  of  Earth,  Oceans,  and  Space,  University  of  New  Hampshire; 
Co-Chair,  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space,  Na-
tional Research Council, The National Academies  ............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 

24 
8 

26 
14 

23 
10 

22 
3 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

NATIONAL  IMPERATIVES  FOR  EARTH 

SCIENCE  RESEARCH 

WEDNESDAY,  MARCH  7,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, AND RELATED 
SCIENCES, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:38  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building.  Hon.  Bill  Nelson,  Chair-
man of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Good  afternoon,  and  thank  you  all  for  coming. 
This  is  not  a  hearing  on  global  warming,  because  the  jury  is  al-
ready  in  and  the  conclusions  have  been  overwhelming.  There’s  al-
most  near-unanimity  of  the  world’s  leading  scientists  that  the  cli-
mate is changing, and we are responsible. 

It  is  especially  sensitive  for  my  state  for  the  obvious  reasons  of 
being  a  peninsula  with  more  coastline  than  any  other  state  in  the 
continental United States. 

So,  today  we’re  going  to  examine  the  more  specific  issue  of 
whether you scientists have the tools that you need to monitor our 
fragile planet, and to study how what we’re doing as humans is af-
fecting it. 

This  is  simply  a  time  in  which  we  cannot  afford  any  mistakes. 
For  more  than  40  years,  NASA  has  developed  satellites  to  study 
this planet, and they have ever-increasing accuracy. Go back to the 
1960’s  TIROS  satellites,  those  fuzzy  views  have  now  turned  to  the 
high-quality  views  that  we  have  today.  Space  has  clearly  turned 
out  to  be  the  best  vantage  point  from  which  we  can  study  and  ob-
serve this planet. 

We depend on these instruments, certainly to forecast our weath-
er.  If  anybody  ever  doubts  the  utility  of  those  instruments,  just 
wait  until  you  have  an  inbound  hurricane,  and  you’re  absolutely 
glued to either the website of NOAA, the Weather Channel, or the 
local channel, that’s giving you these accurate satellite views, along 
with NOAA’s predictions from the National Hurricane Center. 

We depend on these instruments to forecast the weather, to pre-
dict and respond to natural disasters, and to study our climate and 
the  Earth’s  ecosystems.  They  even  help  us  measure  the  effects  of 
land-use, deforestation, and pollution. NASA’s history is filled with 
successful missions, like Landsat, and the Earth Observing System. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

2 

Just  a  week  ago,  during  our  recess,  I  took  off  to  Latin  America 
visiting  with  several  heads  of  state  on  a  mission  to  build  our  rela-
tionships  in  that  region  of  the  world  and  throughout  the  Western 
Hemisphere. 

But  one  of  the  things  that  I  wanted  to  do  en  route  from  having 
seen  the  President  of  Ecuador,  going  to  see  the  President  of  Peru, 
was  to  go  to  the  rainforest.  There  wasn’t  any  sense  of  me  going  to 
the rainforest in Brazil, because they were all off at Carnival. But, 
they  were  available  in  the  rainforest  in  the  east  of  the  Andes  in 
Peru.  I  wanted  to  see  for  myself  the  destruction  of  the  rainforest, 
in  this  case  the  uplands  of  the  rainforest.  On  the  sides  of  those 
mountains  there  was  destruction,  not  so  much  for  logging,  but  for 
the growing of coca and other plants, and legitimate crops. 

I  shared  with  them  that  I  became  interested  in  deforestation  21 
years  ago,  when  I  looked  out  the  window  of  a  spacecraft,  coming 
across South America when, with the naked eye, I could see the de-
struction  of  the  rainforest,  because  of  the  color  contrast  203  miles 
away on the surface of the Earth below. In the same window of the 
spacecraft,  I  could  look  to  the  east,  and  see  the  result  of  the  de-
struction of the rainforest. At the mouth of the Amazon the waters 
of the Atlantic were discolored for hundreds of miles out in the At-
lantic from the additional silt. 

I  want  to  understand  that.  I  want  to  understand  also,  and  this 
Committee  wants  to  understand,  how  you  all  can  help  us  under-
stand  so  much  of  this  delicate,  fragile,  but  extremely  beautiful 
place we call home that is suspended out in the middle of nothing. 
Today  there  is  a  reason  for  concern,  for  what  my  naked  eye  saw 
21  years  ago,  and  what  my  naked  eye  saw  a  week  and  a  half  ago 
on the sides of those lower Eastern Andes. We’ve tried to adjust to 
all  of  this,  and  we  have  a  next-generation  weather  and  earth  sat-
ellite system, NPOESS—it’s in trouble. 

The  project  is  billions  of  dollars  over  budget,  it’s  years  behind 
schedule,  and  the  key  climate  science  instruments  have  been 
thrown  overboard  to  keep  the  program  alive.  And  while  the  Presi-
dent’s  2008  budget  request  does  include  a  miniscule  increase, 
spending on Earth Science peaked in 2000, and has since decreased 
by 25 percent. 

Likewise, the number of Earth Science missions and instruments 
peaked earlier this decade, and is now in a slow decline. The Presi-
dent’s  request  this  year  is  a  billion  and  a  half  for  these  Earth 
Science  projects,  and  you  all  would  like  them  to  be  $2  billion.  I 
want to hear from you, the Committee wants to hear from you. 

This is not so much a problem of misplaced priorities, but rather, 
NASA  is  being  asked  to  do  too  much  with  too  little.  And  in  this 
tough  budget  environment,  it’s  tough  to  get  these  colleagues,  it’s 
tough  to  get  them  here  to  a  hearing,  it’s  tough  to  get  them  to  join 
in  supporting  the  program  recommended  by  the  Decadal  Survey. 
Not at the expense of the other priorities, but by giving NASA the 
resources it needs to accomplish all of its vital missions. 

So,  I  want  to  welcome  Dr.  Freilich,  Dr.  Moore,  Dr.  Brown,  Ms. 
Colleton.  We’re  going  to  do  something  a  little  bit  different.  I’m 
going  to  take  all  of  your  prepared  texts,  they  will  be  a  part  of  the 
record.  We’re  just  going  to  have  a  conversation.  When  some  of  the 
other  Senators  come,  I’ll  just  stop  and  I’ll  let  them  jump  right  in. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

3 

What we want to do is to get the maximum benefit of your thinking 
on what we should do. 

[The prepared statements of the witnesses follow:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BERRIEN MOORE III,  PH.D.,  DISTINGUISHED PROFESSOR 
AND DIRECTOR,  INSTITUTE FOR THE STUDY OF EARTH,  OCEANS,  AND SPACE, 
UNIVERSITY OF NEW HAMPSHIRE;  CO-CHAIR,  COMMITTEE ON EARTH SCIENCE AND 
APPLICATIONS FROM SPACE,  NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL,  THE NATIONAL 
ACADEMIES 
Mr. Chairman, Ranking Minority Member, and members of the Committee: thank 
you  for  inviting  me  here  to  testify  today.  My  name  is  Berrien  Moore,  and  I  am  a 
professor  of  systems  research  at  the  University  of  New  Hampshire  and  Director  of 
the Institute for the Study of Earth, Oceans, and Space. I appear today in my capac-
ity  as  co-chair  of  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)’s  Committee  on  Earth 
Science  and  Applications  from  Space:  A  Community  Assessment  and  Strategy  for 
the Future. 

The  National  Research  Council  is  the  unit  of  the  National  Academies  that  is  re-
sponsible  for  organizing  independent  advisory  studies  for  the  Federal  Government 
on  science  and  technology.  In  response  to  requests  from  NASA,  NOAA,  and  the 
USGS,  the  NRC  has  recently  completed  a  ‘‘Decadal  Survey’’  of  Earth  Science  and 
Applications  from  space.  (‘‘Decadal  surveys’’  are  the  10-year  prioritized  roadmaps 
that  the  NRC  has  done  for  40  years  for  the  astronomers;  this  is  the  first  time  it 
is being done for Earth Science and Applications from space.) Among the key tasks 
in the charge to the Decadal Survey committee were to: 

• Develop a consensus of the top-level scientific questions that should provide the 
focus  for  Earth  and  environmental  observations  in  the  period  2005–2020;  and 
• Develop  a  prioritized  list  of  recommended  space  programs,  missions,  and  sup-

porting activities to address these questions. 

The  NRC  survey  committee  has  prepared  an  extensive  report  in  response  to  this 
charge,  which  I  am  pleased  to  be  able  to  summarize  here  today.  Over  100  leaders 
in  the  Earth  Science  community  participated  on  the  survey  steering  committee  or 
its  seven  study  panels.  It  is  noteworthy  that  this  was  the  first  Earth  Science 
Decadal Survey, and the Committee and panel members did an excellent job in ful-
filling the charge and establishing a consensus—a task many previously considered 
impossible. A copy of the full report has also been provided for your use. 

The  Committee’s  vision  is  encapsulated  in  the  following  declaration,  first  stated 

in the Committee’s April 2005 Interim Report: 1 

‘‘Understanding the complex, changing planet on which we live, how it supports 
life,  and  how  human  activities  affect  its  ability  to  do  so  in  the  future  is  one  of 
the  greatest  intellectual  challenges  facing  humanity.  It  is  also  one  of  the  most 
important  challenges  for  society  as  it  seeks  to  achieve  prosperity,  health,  and 
sustainability.’’ 

As detailed in the Committee’s final report, and as we were profoundly reminded 
by  the  latest  report  from  the  International  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC),  the 
world  faces  significant  and  profound  environmental  challenges:  shortages  of  clean 
and  accessible  freshwater,  degradation  of  terrestrial  and  aquatic  ecosystems,  in-
creases in soil erosion, changes in the chemistry of the atmosphere, declines in fish-
eries, and above all the rapid pace of substantial changes in climate. These changes 
are  not  isolated;  they  interact  with  each  other  and  with  natural  variability  in  com-
plex  ways  that  cascade  through  the  environment  across  local,  regional,  and  global 
scales.  Addressing  these  societal  challenges  requires  that  we  confront  key  scientific 
questions related to ice sheets and sea level change, large-scale and persistent shifts 
in  precipitation  and  water  availability,  transcontinental  air  pollution,  shifts  in  eco-
system  structure  and  function  in  response  to  climate  change,  impacts  of  climate 
change  on  human  health,  and  occurrence  of  extreme  events,  such  as  hurricanes, 
floods and droughts, heat waves, earthquakes, and volcanic eruptions. 

Yet  at  a  time  when  the  need  has  never  been  greater,  we  are  faced  with  an  Earth 
observation  program  that  will  dramatically  diminish  in  capability  over  the  next  5– 
10 years. 

1 NRC,  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space:  Urgent  Needs  and  Opportunities  to  Serve 
the  Nation,  The  National  Academies  Press,  Washington,  D.C.,  2005.  Also  available  online  at 
http://www.nap.edu/catalog/11281.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

4 

The  Interim  Report  described  how  satellite  observations  have  been  critical  to  sci-
entific efforts to understand the Earth as a system of connected components, includ-
ing the land, oceans, atmosphere, biosphere, and solid-Earth. It also gave examples 
of  how  these  observations  have  served  the  nation,  helping  to  save  lives  and  protect 
property,  strengthening  national  security,  and  contributing  to  the  growth  of  our 
economy 2 through  provision  of  timely  environmental  information.  The  Interim  Re-
port  documented  that  NASA  had  canceled,  scaled  back,  or  delayed  at  least  six 
planned  missions  (Table  1),  including  a  Landsat  continuity  mission.  This  led  to  the 
main  finding  in  the  Interim  Report:  ‘‘this  system  of  environmental  satellites  is  at 
risk of collapse.’’ 

Table 1.—Canceled, Descoped, or Delayed Earth Observation Missions 

[From the April 2005 Pre-Publication of the Interim Report of the Decadal Survey on Earth Science and Applications from Space] 

Mission 

Measurement 

Societal benefit 

Status 

Global Precipitation Meas-

urement (GPM) 

Precipitation 

Atmospheric Soundings 

from Geostationary Orbit 
(GIFTS—Geostationary 
Imaging Fourier Trans-
form Spectrometer) 

Ocean Vector Winds (active 
scatterometer follow-on to 
QuikSCAT) 

Temperature and water 

vapor 

Wind speed and direction 
near the ocean surface 

Landsat Data Continuity— 
bridge mission (to fill gap 
between Landsat–7 and 
NPOESS) 

Land cover 

Glory 

Wide Swath Ocean Altim-
eter (on the Ocean Sur-
face Topography Mission, 
OSTM) 

Optical properties of 

aerosols; solar irradiance 

Sea level in two dimen-

sions 

Reduced vulnerability to 

floods and droughts; im-
proved capability to man-
age water resources in 
arid regions; improved 
forecasts of hurricanes. 
Protection of life and prop-

erty through improved 
weather forecasts and se-
vere storm warnings. 

Improved severe weather 

warnings to ships at sea; 
improved crop planning 
and yields through better 
predictions of El Nin˜ o. 

Monitoring of deforest-

ation; identification of 
mineral resources; track-
ing of the conversion of 
agricultural land to other 
uses. 

Improved scientific under-
standing of factors that 
force climate change. 

Monitoring of coastal cur-
rents, eddies, and tides, 
all of which affect fish-
eries, navigation, and 
ocean climate. 

Delayed 

Canceled 

Canceled 

Canceled 

Canceled 

Instrument can-

celed—descope of 
an enhanced OSTM 

Since  the  publication  of  the  Interim  Report,  the  Hydros  and  Deep  Space  Climate 
Observatory  missions  were  canceled;  the  flagship  Global  Precipitation  Mission  was 
delayed for another two and a half years; significant cuts were made to NASA’s Re-
search  and  Analysis  program;  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  mission  was  de-
layed for a year and a half; a key atmospheric profiling sensor planned for the next 
generation  of  NOAA  geostationary  satellites  was  canceled;  and  cost  overruns  led  to 
the  NPOESS  program  undergoing  a  ‘‘Nunn-McCurdy’’  review.  The  recertified 
NPOESS  program  delays  the  first  launch  by  3  years,  eliminates  2  of  the  planned 
6  spacecraft,  and  de-manifests  or  de-scopes  a  number  of  instruments,  with  par-
ticular  consequences  for  measurement  of  the  forcing  and  feedbacks  that  need  to  be 
measured  to  understand  the  magnitude,  pace,  and  consequences  of  global  and  re-
gional climate change. 

It is against this backdrop that I discuss the present report. 
The Decadal Survey presents a vision for the Earth Science program; an analysis 
of the existing Earth observing system and recommendations to help restore its ca-
pabilities;  an  assessment  of  and  recommendations  for  new  observations  and  mis-
sions  needed  for  the  next  decade;  an  examination  of  and  recommendations  con-
cerning  effective  application  of  those  observations;  and  an  analysis  of  how  best  to 
sustain  that  observation  and  applications  system.  A  critical  element  of  the  study’s 

2 It  has  been  estimated  that  one  third  of  the  $10  trillion  U.S.  economy  is  weather-sensitive 
or  environment-sensitive  (NRC,  Satellite  Observations  of  the  Earth’s  Environment:  Accelerating 
the  Transition  of  Research  to  Operations,  The  National  Academies  Press,  Washington,  D.C., 
2003). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

5 

vision is its emphasis on the need to place the benefits to society that can be provided 
by an effective Earth observation system on a par with scientific advancement. 

The integrated suite of space missions and supporting and complementary activi-
ties  that  are  described  in  our  report  will  support  the  development  of  numerous  ap-
plications  of  high  importance  to  society.  The  expected  benefits  of  the  fully-imple-
mented program include: 

• Human Health 

More  reliable  forecasts  of  infectious  and  vector-borne  disease  outbreaks  for  dis-
ease control and response. 
• Earthquake Early Warning 

Identification  of  active  faults  and  prediction  of  the  likelihood  of  earthquakes  to 
enable  effective  investment  in  structural  improvements,  inform  land-use  deci-
sions, and provide early warning of impending earthquakes. 

• Weather Prediction 

Longer-term, more reliable weather forecasts. 

• Sea Level Rise 

Climate predictions based on better understanding of ocean temperature and ice 
sheet volume changes and feedback to enable effective coastal community plan-
ning. 

• Climate Prediction 

Robust estimates of primary climate forcings for improved climate forecasts, in-
cluding  local  predictions  of  the  effects  of  climate  change;  determination  in  time 
and space of sources and sinks of carbon dioxide. 

• Freshwater Availability 

More  accurate  and  longer-term  precipitation  and  drought  forecasts  to  improve 
water resource management. 

• Ecosystem Services 

More reliable land-use, agricultural, and ocean productivity forecasts to improve 
planting and harvesting schedules and fisheries management. 

• Air Quality 

More  reliable  air  quality  forecasts  to  enable  effective  urban  pollution  manage-
ment. 

• Extreme Storm Warnings 

Longer-term, more reliable storm track forecasts and intensification predictions 
to enable effective evacuation planning. 

I  will  now  turn  to  a  brief  discussion  of  the  budgetary  implications  of  our  rec-

ommendations. 

The  President’s  FY08  budget  request  for  NASA  Earth  Science  is  a  mixture  of 
some  good  news  and  bad  news.  The  primary  bit  of  good  news  is  the  small  bottom 
line  increases  for  2008  and  2009.  These  increases  address  the  needs  of  currently 
planned missions already in development, the completion of which is consistent with 
the Decadal Survey’s baseline set of assumptions. 

Unfortunately,  the  out-year  budgets  reveal  fundamental  flaws  in  the  budget  and 
NASA’s  Earth  Science  plans—the  budgets  are  totally  inadequate  to  accomplish  the 
Decadal Survey’s recommendations. In 2010, the Earth Science budget begins to de-
cline  again  and  reaches  a  20-year  low,  in  real  terms,  in  2012.  This  decline  reflects 
that  the  2008  budget  contains  no  provision  for  new  missions,  nor  does  it  allow  us 
to address the significant challenges facing our planet. These disturbing broad budg-
etary trends are captured in Figure 1. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

6 

Figure  1:  The  NASA  Earth  Science  Budget  in  constant  FY06  dollars  (normalized 
for  full-cost  accounting  across  entire  timescale;  assumes  3  percent/year  inflation 
from  2006  to  2012).  Mission  supporting  activities  include  Earth  Science  Research, 
Applied Sciences, Education and Outreach, and Earth Science Technology. 

Before turning to NOAA, I want to emphasize that the problems in the out-years 
appear to be due entirely to the lack of adequate resources. In fact, at a NASA town 
hall meeting that followed the release of our report on January 15, 2007 at the 2007 
annual  meeting  of  the  American  Meteorological  Society,  the  head  of  NASA’s  Earth 
Science  program,  who  appears  today  with  me  as  a  witness,  stated  that  the  rec-
ommendations  in  our  report  provided  the  roadmap  for  the  Earth  Science  program 
we should have. 

The NOAA NESDIS budget picture is also a mixture of some good and bad news. 
In  this  case,  the  budget  takes  a  small  downturn  in  FY08,  followed  by  significant 
growth  in  FY09–FY10,  before  turning  down  again  in  FY11  (Figure  2).  It  remains 
to be seen whether this ∼$200 M/year growth in FY09 and FY10 can enable restora-
tion  of  some  of  the  lost  capabilities  to  NPOESS  and  GOES–R.  There  appears  to  be 
no  budgetary  wedge  for  new  starts.  Finally,  for  a  variety  of  reasons,  the  NOAA 
NESDIS budget is far from transparent, especially in the out-years. 

Figure  2:  The  NOAA  NESDIS  Budget  in  constant  2006  dollars  (assumes  3  per-
cent/year  inflation  from  2006–2012).  Mission  supporting  activities  include  NOAA’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
e
r
o
o
m
7
0
3

s
p
e
.
1
e
r
o
o
m
7
0
3

7 

Data  Centers  and  Information  Services,  Data  System  Enhancements,  Data  Exploi-
tation, and Information Services, and Facilities and Critical Infrastructure Improve-
ments. 

As  detailed  in  our  report,  between  2006  and  the  end  of  the  decade,  the  number 
of  operating  U.S.  missions  will  decrease  dramatically  and  the  number  of  operating 
sensors  and  instruments  on  NASA  spacecraft,  most  of  which  are  well  past  their 
nominal lifetimes, may decrease by some 35 percent. If present trends continue, re-
ductions of some 50 percent are possible by 2015. 

Were  this  to  pass,  we  would  have  chosen,  in  effect,  to  partially  blind  ourselves 
at a time of increasing need to monitor, predict, and develop responses to numerous 
global environmental challenges. Vital climate records, such as the measurement of 
solar  irradiance  and  the  Earth’s  response,  will  be  placed  in  jeopardy  or  lost.  Meas-
urements of aerosols, ozone profiles, sea surface height, sources and sinks of impor-
tant  greenhouse  gases,  patterns  of  air  and  coastal  pollution,  and  even  winds  in  the 
atmosphere are among the numerous critical measurements that are at risk or sim-
ply  will  not  occur  if  we  follow  the  path  of  the  President  2008  budget  and  the  pro-
posed out-year run out. 

Taking  this  path,  we  will  also  forgo  the  economic  benefits  that  would  have  come, 
for  example,  from  better  management  of  energy  and  water,  and  improved  weather 
predictions.3 Without  action  on  the  report’s  recommendations,  a  decades-long  im-
provements  in  the  skill  in  which  we  make  weather  forecasts  will  stall,  or  even  re-
verse;  this  may  be  accompanied  by  diminished  capacity  to  forecast  severe  weather 
events  and  manage  disaster  response  and  relief  efforts.  The  nation’s  capabilities  to 
forecast space weather will also be at risk, with impacts on commercial aviation and 
space technology.4 

The  world  is  facing  significant  environmental  challenges:  shortages  of  clean  and 
accessible  freshwater,  degradation  of  terrestrial  and  aquatic  ecosystems,  increases 
in  soil  erosion,  changes  in  the  chemistry  of  the  atmosphere,  declines  in  fisheries, 

3 In a typical hurricane season, NOAA’s forecasts, warnings, and the associated emergency re-
sponses result in a $3 billion savings. Two-thirds of this savings, $2 billion, is attributed to the 
reduction  in  hurricane-related  deaths,  and  one-third  of  this  savings,  $1  billion,  is  attributed  to 
a  reduction  in  property-related  damage  because  of  preparedness  actions.  Advances  in  satellite 
information,  data  assimilation  techniques,  and  more  powerful  computers  to  run  more  sophisti-
cated  numerical  models,  have  lead  to  more  accurate  weather  forecasts  and  warnings.  Today, 
NOAA’s  five-day  hurricane  forecasts,  which  utilize  satellite  data,  are  as  accurate  as  its  three- 
day forecasts were 10 years ago. The additional advanced notice has a significant positive effect 
on many sectors of our economy. See statement and references therein of Edward Morris, Direc-
tor,  Office  of  Space  Commercialization,  NOAA,  Hearing  on  Space  and  U.S.  National  Power, 
Committee  on  Armed  Services  Subcommittee  on  Strategic  Forces,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives,  June  21,  2006.  Available  at:  http://www.legislative.noaa.gov/Testimony/morris 
062106.pdf. 

4 Ibid. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
e
r
o
o
m
7
0
3

8 

and  the  likelihood  of  significant  changes  in  climate.  These  changes  are  occurring 
over and above the stresses imposed by the natural variability of a dynamic planet, 
as  well  as  the  effects  of  past  and  existing  patterns  of  conflict,  poverty,  disease,  and 
malnutrition. Further, these changes interact with each other and with natural var-
iability  in  complex  ways  that  cascade  through  the  environment  across  local,  re-
gional,  and  global  scales.  To  cope  responsibly  with  these  challenges  requires  infor-
mation  about  our  planet;  it  requires  us  to  expand  our  scientific  basis  for  foreseeing 
potential changes and patterns, and this science is dependent upon expanded space- 
based  observation.  The  needed  new  missions  are  set  forth  in  the  Decadal  Survey; 
these missions need to be implemented in the coming decade. 

I  would  like  to  thank  the  Committee  for  inviting  me  to  testify,  and  I  would  be 

delighted to answer any questions. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF OTIS B.  BROWN,  PH.D.,  DEAN,  ROSENSTIEL SCHOOL OF 
MARINE AND ATMOSPHERIC SCIENCE, UNIVERSITY OF MIAMI; MEMBER, COMMITTEE 
ON EARTH SCIENCE AND APPLICATIONS FROM SPACE,  NATIONAL RESEARCH 
COUNCIL, THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES 
Mr. Chairman, Ranking Minority Member, and members of the Committee: thank 
you  for  inviting  me  here  to  testify  today.  My  name  is  Otis  Brown,  and  I  am  Dean 
of  the  Rosenstiel  School  of  Marine  and  Atmospheric  Science,  University  of  Miami. 
I am also a member of the National Research Council’s Committee on Earth Science 
and Applications from Space. 

As dean of the Rosenstiel School, I have first-hand experience how satellite obser-
vations  provide  real-world  results.  Following  Hurricane  Katrina,  imagery  from  our 
Center  for  Southeastern  Tropical  Advanced  Remote  Sensing  (CSTARS)  assisted  re-
lief and recovery efforts in New Orleans, tracking to see when and where flood wa-
ters had receded to increase the effectiveness of rescue efforts. Also pertinent to the 
environmental  challenges  presenting  themselves  in  the  Gulf  states,  we  employed 
satellite  imagery  that  identifies  the  rate  of  subsidence  in  the  Mississippi  Delta  and 
New  Orleans—equally  invaluable  information  when  making  decisions  about  the  re-
ality and requirements of rebuilding in this area and long-term environmental chal-
lenges. This same imagery is what we use to monitor water levels in the Everglades 
and  outbreaks  of  red  tide.  And,  uses  for  satellite  data  only  continue  to  grow  as  we 
learn  to  ‘‘see’’  phenomena  like  changes  in  sea  surface  temperature,  sea  level,  and 
the  size  of  polar  ice  caps.  I  cannot  emphasize  enough  how  vital  satellite  imagery 
has  become  to  earth  observation  and  consequently  our  ability  to  predict,  plan,  pre-
pare, and respond. 

I’ve been asked to discuss my perspectives on the ‘‘National Imperatives for Earth 
Sciences Research.’’ This topic includes areas relevant to many parts of the Federal 
Government.  My  testimony  today  focuses  on  the  roles  of  NASA  and  NOAA.  It  also 
addresses some resource and coordination issues for these two agencies. 

As  you  may  know  I  have  been  part  of  the  team  that  recently  produced  a  decadal 
plan  for  Earth  observations  from  space,  which  provides  a  prioritized  roadmap.  Our 
vision is captured in the following declaration: 

Understanding the complex, changing planet on which we live, how it supports 
life,  and  how  human  activities  affect  its  ability  to  do  so  in  the  future  is  one  of 
the  greatest  intellectual  challenges  facing  humanity.  It  is  also  one  of  the  most 
important  challenges  for  society  as  it  seeks  to  achieve  prosperity,  health,  and 
sustainability. 

As detailed in the NRC report, and further emphasized by the latest report of the 
Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC),  our  planet  is  faced  with  a 
number  of  significant  scientific  and  societal  challenges  and  their  impacts  on  key 
parts of our society, economy, and health. The two-year study contained in the NRC 
report  delineates  how  NASA’s  Earth  Science  budget  has  declined  30  percent  since 
2000, with more funding reductions planned as its priority missions of manned trips 
to  Mars  and  a  station  on  the  Moon  take  further  hold.  The  National  Ocean  and  At-
mospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  likewise  faces  funding  challenges  with  its  Na-
tional  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS)—now 
3  years  behind  schedule  and  $3  billion  over  budget.  Additionally,  many  of  the  sat-
ellite system’s advanced weather and climate instruments have been dropped to ad-
dress  cost  and  schedule  challenges.  Meanwhile,  current  satellites  continue  to  age, 
and  many  of  us  foresee  major  shortcomings  in  satellite  observations  by  the  end  of 
this decade that will undo much of the progress we have made in Earth observation 
and weather prediction. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

9 

So,  at  a  time  when  our  need  for  understanding  the  Earth  system  and  the  need 
for Earth observations have never been greater, we are faced with declining invest-
ments  in  Earth  Science,  and,  an  Earth  observation  program  that  will  significantly 
diminish in capability over the next decade. 

The  first  question  the  National  Research  Council  committee  had  to  address  was 
the  national  capabilities  for  Earth  observations.  We  were  troubled  by  the  answer. 
We  found  that  the  current  investment  strategies  had  led  to  a  system  at  risk  of 
collapse.  That  assessment  was  based  on  the  observed  decline  in  funding  for  Earth 
observation  missions  in  NASA  and  the  consequent  cancellation,  downsizing,  and 
delay  of  a  number  of  critical  missions  and  instruments  in  both  agencies.  Since  the 
interim  report,  matters  have  only  worsened,  with  further  cancellations,  descopings 
and  delays  of  NOAA  and  NASA  satellite  plans.  This  will  result  in  an  overall  deg-
radation of the network of Earth observing satellites. 

There are many potential consequences. Some examples are: 
• Weather forecasts and warnings may become less accurate, putting more people 
at  risk  and  diminishing  the  proven  economic  value  of  accurate  forecasts—this 
is  particularly  important  to  this  country  since  we  must  cope  with  many  forms 
of  extreme  weather,  be  it  in  the  form  of  hurricanes,  tornadoes,  drought,  floods 
or winter storms. 
• Climate  variability  and  the  rate  of  change  need  to  be  better  quantified.  Earth 
is warming because of a small imbalance between incoming solar radiation and 
outgoing  radiation  from  Earth.  Without  the  recommended  measurements,  we 
will not be able to quantify how this net energy imbalance is changing, or when 
or if the planet will stop warming. 
• Climate models have improved steadily over the years, but are far from perfect 
and  must  be  improved  if  we  are  to  intelligently  cope  with  climate  change.  Sat-
ellites  provide  unique  observations  of  the  Earth  system  and  validate  and  im-
prove these models. 
• Sea level is rising and glaciers and ice-fields around the world are melting, but 
we  just  don’t  know  how  fast  these  are  occurring.  Without  continuing  quan-
titative  observations  provided  via  satellites,  we  can’t  know  how  these  rates 
change or the implications for coastal communities. 
• Satellite  observations  could  well  be  pivotal  in  resolving  a  controversy  about 
whether  the  frequency  and  intensity  of  hurricanes  are  increasing;  observations 
of the atmosphere and oceans are essential. 
• The  limited  signals  of  cataclysmic  activity  come  through  vigilant  observation. 
That  means  the  risk  of  missing  early  detection  of  earthquakes,  tsunamis,  and 
volcanic eruptions will increase. 
• The  bottom  line  is:  Earth  Science  is  based  fundamentally  on  observations. 
While it is impossible to predict what scientific advances will not occur without 
the observations, or what surprises we will miss, we can be sure the rate of sci-
entific  progress  will  be  greatly  slowed—perhaps  even  undone  to  some  degree. 
Without a doubt, it takes us backward rather than forwards. 

Significant  advances  in  hurricane  forecasting  over  the  past  three  decades  have 
come  from  orbiting  satellites  that  take  timely,  high-resolution  pictures  and  provide 
improved estimates of surface wind over the ocean. The satellite images are all over 
the  TV  for  the  public  to  view,  but  scientists,  dissect  them  further.  From  sea  level, 
sea surface temperatures and winds to red tide outbreaks and oil spills, satellite ob-
servations afford us a better, informed view of our Earth. 

The climate debate has been driven by debate over model capabilities and the lack 
of  long-term  critical  observations  relevant  to  climate.  Many  of  the  capabilities  to 
make  such  observations  exist  in  the  research  domain,  but  have  not  been 
transitioned  into  an  operational  setting.  Our  NRC  report  noted  the  difficulties  in 
transferring  NASA  and  NOAA  research  into  operational  use.  That  is  because  there 
is  currently  no  process  to  include  the  necessary  scientific  input,  resources  and  ex-
ploitation  capabilities  to  either  facilitate  or  to  define  this  transition.  Thus,  we  are 
seeing the winding down of the NASA Earth Observing System and its broad Earth 
observing  capabilities  and  information  delivery  systems,  with  no  apparent  way  for 
our  Nation  to  harvest  the  fruits  of  this  multi-billion  dollar  investment,  or,  to  con-
tinue  prototype  research  systems  with  proven  operational  value.  The  follow-on 
NOAA  system,  NPOESS,  is  late  and  more  than  likely  will  not  overlap  the  NASA 
systems,  and,  most  of  the  climate-related  capabilities  are  not  in  its  baseline.  Put 
succinctly,  much  needed  long-term  time-series  of  Earth  processes  required  for  deci-
sions in this changing world will be lost. This is due to the lack of a functional rela-
tionship  between  research  (NASA)  and  operations  (NOAA)  for  Earth  observing  sys-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

10 

tems, and, a lack of resources in NOAA to address all of its Earth observing require-
ments. 

The  challenge  in  Earth  Sciences  is  that  the  breadth  of  study  is  so  large  that  it’s 
difficult  to  develop  a  set  of  priorities  across  disciplines.  This  is  the  first  ever  report 
to  provide  an  integrated  set  of  national  priorities  for  Earth  observing  from  space. 
It’s  equally  difficult  for  anyone  to  imagine  how  it  affects  them  individually.  Often 
times,  it  seems  we  speak  in  a  foreign  language  about  solar  irradiance,  vector  sea 
surface winds, limb sounding of ozone profiles and water vapor soundings from geo-
stationary  and  polar  orbits—perhaps  this  is  not  the  clearest  way  for  the  public  to 
understand how humans have become dependent on tools that reside in outer space. 
What  is  important  to  understand  about  the  plan  our  committee  recommended  is 
that its financial requirements are not astronomical. In fact, implementing all of the 
recommendations requires only that we bring the program up to funding levels com-
parable  to  the  year  2000.  The  plan  we  recommend  calls  for  undertaking  17  new 
NASA  and  NOAA  missions  in  the  period  2008–2020,  as  well  as  restoring  some  of 
the  capabilities  lost  on  NPOESS  and  GOES,  and  revitalizing  a  few  delayed  NASA 
missions  like  GPM  and  Landsat.  Our  recommendations  for  NASA  can  be  imple-
mented in an extremely cost-effective manner. The Committee understood the finan-
cial  constraints  and  therefore  had  to  find  missions  capable  of  tackling  several  sci-
entific  questions  simultaneously.  The  result  is  that  we  reduced  the  number  of  pos-
sible new missions from more than 100 down to 17 broad-ranging, high-value, multi-
purpose missions. But to accomplish this, NASA’s Earth Science budget must be re-
stored to year 2000 funding levels. We think this is very reasonable given the obvi-
ous societal needs and benefits. 

The  truth  of  the  matter  is  that  this  field  of  science  is  inextricably  linked  to  our 
daily  life  and  that  of  future  generations.  Climate  variability  and  natural  disasters 
are  taking  a  significant  toll  on  our  economy,  our  environment,  and  our  well  being. 
And,  that  is  why  we  must  sustain  the  Earth  observations  that  underpin  national 
preparedness  and  response.  Implementing  these  missions  will  not  only  greatly  re-
duce  the  risk  of  natural  disasters  of  all  kinds  to  the  people  of  our  country  and  the 
world, they will also support more efficient management of natural resources includ-
ing  water,  energy,  fisheries,  and  ecosystems,  and  support  the  economy.  Thus,  the 
cost of the program is repaid many times over. 

The observing system we envision is affordable and will help establish a firm, sus-
tainable  foundation  for  Earth  Science  and  real  societal  benefits  through  the  year 
2020 and beyond. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  I  would  be  pleased  to 

answer any questions that you may have. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  MICHAEL H.  FREILICH,  DIRECTOR,  EARTH SCIENCE 
DIVISION,  SCIENCE MISSION DIRECTORATE,  NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE 
ADMINISTRATION 
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to appear today to discuss the President’s FY 2008 budget request for NASA’s Earth 
Science  program.  I  welcome  the  chance  to  discuss  the  important  area  of  Earth 
Science,  especially  in  light  of  the  recently  released  National  Research  Council’s 
Earth Science Decadal Survey. 

NASA’s FY 2008 budget request includes $1.5 billion for the study of planet Earth 
from  space.  This  represents  an  increase  of  $27.7  million  over  the  FY  2007  budget 
request, and will fund a wide-ranging and balanced program of activities, including: 
developing,  launching,  and  operating  Earth-observing  space  missions;  competitively 
selected  research  and  analysis  science  investigations  conducted  by  NASA  and  non- 
NASA  researchers;  Applied  Science  projects  that  help  other  Federal  and  regional 
agencies and organizations to efficiently use products from NASA Earth research to 
advance  their  missions;  ongoing  technology  development  efforts  to  enable  the  mis-
sions  of  the  future;  and,  education  and  public  outreach  programs  to  make  our 
knowledge  of  the  Earth  accessible  to  the  world.  NASA’s  budget  request  supports  a 
balanced program, allocating over 30 percent of NASA’s request for the Science Mis-
sion  Directorate  and  within  the  Science  Mission  Directorate,  allocating  27  percent 
of funding for Earth Science. 

NASA  remains  by  far  the  largest  single  contributor  to  the  interagency  U.S.  Cli-
mate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP).  Much  of  the  science  community’s  present 
state  of  knowledge  about  global  change—including  many  of  the  measurements  and 
a  significant  fraction  of  the  analyses  which  serve  as  the  foundation  for  the  recent 
report  of  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC)—is  derived  from 
NASA’s Earth Science program. To list just a few examples, using data from Earth 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

11 

observing  satellites  NASA-supported  researchers  are:  monitoring  ice  cover  and  ice 
sheet motions in the Arctic and the Antarctic; quantifying the short-term and long- 
term  changes  to  the  Earth’s  protective  shield  of  stratospheric  ozone,  including  the 
positive impacts of the Montreal protocols; discovering robust relationships between 
increasing  upper  ocean  temperature  and  decreasing  primary  production  from  the 
phytoplankton that form the base of the oceans’ food chain; and, using a fleet of sat-
ellites flying in formation (the ‘‘A-Train’’) to make unique, global, near-simultaneous 
measurements  of  aerosols,  clouds,  temperature  and  relative  humidity  profiles,  and 
radiative fluxes. 

Our improved understanding of Earth System processes leads to improvements in 
sophisticated  weather  and  climate  models,  which  in  turn—when  initialized  using 
the satellite data—can be used to predict natural and human-caused changes in the 
Earth’s environment over time scales of hours to years. 

Importantly,  near-real-time  measurements  from  NASA  research  missions  (includ-
ing  the  Tropical  Rainfall  Mapping  Mission,  QuikSCAT,  the  Atmospheric  Infrared 
Sounder instrument on the Aqua mission, and others) are used routinely by the Na-
tional Oceanic Administration (NOAA) and other U.S. and international agencies to 
improve  weather  forecasting.  Similarly,  high  quality  measurements  obtained  by 
operational weather satellites provide essential context for the scientific analyses of 
the NASA research mission data. 

As  of  today,  NASA  is  operating  14  Earth  observing  missions.  Five  more  missions 
are quite far advanced in their development, and will be launched in 2008 and 2009. 
Of  these,  the  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System 
(NPOESS)  Preparatory  Project  (NPP)  and  the  Ocean  Surface  Topography  Mission 
(OSTM)  will  continue  critical  Earth  System  and  climate  measurements  that  were 
initiated  by  the  Earth  Observing  System  (for  NPP)  and  the  TOPEX/Poseidon  and 
Jason-1  missions  (for  OSTM).  The  Glory  mission  will  fly  an  instrument  to  extend 
our  measurements  of  total  solar  irradiance,  as  well  as  an  instrument  that  will  pro-
vide unique, first-ever measurements of properties of atmospheric aerosols. The Or-
biting  Carbon  Observatory  (OCO)  and  the  Aquarius  mission  will  make  new,  first- 
of-a-kind  global  measurements  of  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  concentrations  and 
ocean  surface  salinity—both  parameters  of  known  importance  to  the  study  of  cli-
mate change. 

The  FY  2008  budget  request  also  funds  the  reconstituted  Landsat  Data  Con-
tinuity  Mission  (LDCM)  for  launch  in  2011,  and  the  Global  Precipitation  Measure-
ment  Mission  (GPM)  for  launch  of  its  Core  spacecraft  not  later  than  2013,  followed 
a  year  later  by  launch  of  the  NASA  GPM  Constellation  spacecraft.  Extending  the 
pioneering rain measurements initiated with the joint U.S.-Japanese Tropical Rain-
fall  Mapping  Mission,  and  providing  a  calibration  standard  for  several  other  rain- 
measuring instruments orbited by others, the GPM mission will provide us with ac-
curate,  global  rain  measurements  much  more  frequently  than  currently  possible. 
Knowledge  of  accurate  rainfall  rates  and  atmospheric  water  quantities  is  essential 
for  the  study  of  the  Earth’s  hydrologic  cycle  and  its  sensitivity  to  climate  change. 
In addition, the GPM measurements will be used by operational weather prediction 
agencies  around  the  globe  to  improve  weather  forecasts  and  severe  storm  pre-
dictions. 

Even  as  we  are  acquiring  and  analyzing  measurements  today,  we  are  planning 
the  satellites,  field  experiments,  scientific  investigations,  and  Earth  System  models 
of the future. The recently released Earth Science Decadal Survey provides, for the 
first time, a scientifically based, community consensus statement of the top priority 
future  Earth  System  Science  problems  to  be  addressed,  and  it  suggests  a  sequence 
of notional missions whose measurements could contribute to advancing our under-
standing of the Earth and its environment. 

We  welcome  the  Decadal  Survey—indeed,  we  asked  for  it.  NASA,  along  with 
NOAA  and  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey  (USGS),  requested  and  funded  the  National 
Research  Council  (NRC)  to  conduct  this  first  Decadal  Survey  in  Earth  Science.  We 
formally  made  the  request  in  the  fall  of  2003  and  the  study  began  in  earnest  in 
2004.  The  massive  undertaking  was  only  completed  this  January.  We  are  grateful 
for  all  of  the  efforts  of  the  Co-Chairs  and  NRC  staff,  the  members  of  the  Decadal 
Survey Executive Committee, and the literally hundreds of Earth Science research-
ers  who  volunteered  their  time  and  their  ideas.  Their  success  in  creating  scientific 
consensus  across  the  broad  and  diverse  Earth  Science  community  is  a  substantial 
achievement. 

The  science  priorities  identified  by  the  Decadal  Survey  will  be  our  primary  guide 
as  we  design  and  select  Earth  observing  missions  to  be  flown  in  the  next  10–15 
years. In the space sciences, NASA has a long history of guidance by NRC Decadal 
Surveys. Indeed, even in the Earth Sciences where this is the first Decadal Survey, 
the  President’s  FY  2008  budget  request  for  NASA  was  guided  by  recommendations 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

12 

included in the interim report issued by the Decadal Survey committee in 2005. The 
FY  2008  budget  request  includes  funding  and  predictable  launch  dates  for  the 
Landsat  Data  Continuity  Mission,  the  Glory  aerosol  and  solar  irradiance  mission, 
and  the  Global  Precipitation  Mission,  all  of  which  figured  strongly  in  the  interim 
report. 

Unfortunately,  the  Decadal  Survey  arrived  too  late  for  its  specific  recommenda-
tions  to  influence  the  FY  2008  budget  process,  but  its  scientific  priorities  will  be 
used  in  development  of  the  FY  2009  and  subsequent  budget  requests.  NASA’s  FY 
2008  budget  request  also  includes  funding  for  an  additional,  unspecified,  competed 
flight  mission,  which  will  launch  sometime  around  2014.  We  will  be  guided  by  the 
Decadal  Survey  as  we  choose  the  scientific  focus  and  instrument  complement  for 
this mission, starting no earlier than 2008. 

In addition to its science priorities and the notional mission set, the Decadal Sur-
vey  provides  several  recommendations  relevant  to  the  design  and  implementation 
of the Earth Science flight program. Survey recommendations in the areas of inter-
national  collaboration  and  technology  investment  deserve  particular  consideration. 
We all recognize that a constellation of missions and many simultaneous measure-
ments—such as those obtained by the A-Train spacecraft described above—are need-
ed to understand the interactions between Earth system processes. No agency or na-
tion can afford to develop and fly all necessary missions single handedly. 

The  Decadal  Survey  emphatically  recommends  international  collaboration,  to 
maximize  humankind’s  benefits  from  our  net  investment  in  Earth  Science,  and  to 
avoid unnecessary duplication. To this end, we have already begun discussions with 
our 5 closest international space agency partners: the Canadian, European, French, 
Japanese,  and  German  space  agencies.  We  have  begun  planning  substantive  bilat-
eral meetings to be held this spring, to identify and refine areas of common interest 
and complementary expertise. We are also actively engaged—indeed NASA and the 
U.S.  are  leaders—in  international  coordination  bodies  such  as  the  Committee  on 
Earth  Observation  Satellites  (CEOS)  and  the  international  Group  on  Earth  Obser-
vations (GEO). As with our present OSTM, Aquarius, and GPM missions, we antici-
pate  substantial  joint  projects  with  international  partners  as  we  construct  missions 
to address the Decadal Survey’s science questions. 

Science-driven  technology  investment  is  one  of  the  keys  to  the  design  and  imple-
mentation of any future mission set. It is essential to have the technology developed 
and  tested  in  a  relevant  environment  prior  to  the  approval  of  any  mission.  This 
helps to avoid cost overruns that occur when problems arise with a new technology 
late  in  the  mission  development  cycle.  To  foster  advanced  technologies  for  Earth 
Science,  NASA’s  strategy  is  two  pronged  as  recommended  by  the  Decadal  Survey, 
with both focused technology and core technology elements. 

Where  we  know  the  missions  we  want  to  implement  and  what  new  technologies 
are  required  on  a  certain  schedule,  we  make  focused  investments  to  assure  tech-
nologies  are  available  when  we  issue  competitive  solicitations  for  mission  formula-
tion  and  development.  This  is  done  through  the  highly  successful  Instrument  Incu-
bator  Program,  funded  under  the  Earth  Science  Technology  Office,  which  matures 
instrument technologies for future measurements. 

The  second  prong  addresses  the  seed  corn  or  ‘‘core  technologies,’’  for  advanced 
Earth observing missions of the future. Where we know that certain classes of tech-
nologies  are  needed  for  the  types  of  measurements  we  would  like  to  make  in  the 
future,  or  are  simply  convinced  that  investment  in  certain  sensor  or  detector  tech-
nology areas will yield fruit, we will issue open, competitive solicitations for the best 
ideas.  Examples  include  advanced  component  development  (which  allows  scientists 
and  technologists  to  take  an  idea  from  the  concept  to  the  bench  top  demonstration 
stage), laser risk reduction (which has developed fundamental lidar technologies ap-
plicable  to  multiple  NASA  missions),  and  advanced  information  systems  technology 
development  (which  provides  advanced  operations  technologies  which  aid  in  reduc-
ing future mission costs). 

The Decadal Survey, the U.S. Climate Change Science Program, and NASA’s own 
planning in Earth Science all assume the presence of an operational system of envi-
ronmental  monitoring  satellites  that  can  make  climate-quality  measurements.  The 
Nation  needs  such  a  system.  That  is  why  NASA  is  a  member  of  the  NPOESS  gov-
erning  body,  and  why  NASA  entered  into  a  partnership  with  the  NPOESS  Inte-
grated  Program  Office  to  develop  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  (NPP).  NPP  is 
designed  both  to  continue  essential  measurements  from  NASA’s  Earth  Observing 
System  satellites  as  well  as  provide  a  demonstration  of  instruments  to  be  flown  on 
NPOESS. 

The  Nunn-McCurdy-certified  NPOESS  program,  as  you  are  aware,  focuses 
NPOESS  on  its  weather  mission  and  deletes  many  of  the  capabilities  previously 
planned  for  climate  science.  It  is  thus  important  to  recognize  that  the  NRC’s  work 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

13 

is  not  yet  done.  As  the  Decadal  Survey  Committee  was  finalizing  its  notional  mis-
sion  set  and  sequence,  the  full  impact  of  the  removal  of  the  climate  sensors  from 
the NPOESS program was just coming to light. In discussion with the NRC, NASA 
and NOAA have structured a follow-on activity wherein a subset of the Decadal Sur-
vey Committee, augmented by others they may deem necessary, would hold a work-
shop  and  provide  input  on  how  the  agencies  might  mitigate  the  impact  of  the 
changes  to  NPOESS.  We  expect  that  the  NRC  workshop  will  take  place  no  later 
than early summer, in time to provide recommendations useful for helping to deter-
mine the FY09 budget. 

NASA  is  proceeding  with  a  mission  roadmapping  activity  to  determine  the  focus 
and content of our specific future Earth observing missions. The roadmap will inte-
grate  the  scientific  recommendations  and  priority/sequence  of  the  Decadal  Survey, 
the  joint  and  ongoing  NASA–NOAA  examinations  of  the  NPOESS  Nunn-McCurdy 
changes,  and  the  contributions  of  our  international  partners.  Through  a  series  of 
concept  studies  conducted  at  NASA  centers  (some  actually  begun  in  anticipation  of 
the  Decadal  Survey  mission  suggestions),  we  are  carefully  examining  the  Decadal 
Survey’s  notional  missions.  The  studies  are  assessing  the  technological  readiness, 
system  engineering  challenges,  and  expected  costs  (including  support  for  scientific 
validation and analysis of the mission data) of each notional missions. These concept 
studies are accessing the full capability of the NASA mission design and costing ap-
paratus,  to  complement  the  estimates  assigned  by  the  NRC.  As  the  roadmap 
evolves,  community  involvement  will  be  assured  through  regular  interactions  with 
the Earth Science Subcommittee of the NASA Advisory Council, as well as existing 
discipline- and science-focus theme working groups which regularly inform our plans 
and examine our progress within the NASA Earth Science Division. 

The  roadmapping  process  includes  the  anticipated  update  later  this  year  to  the 
NASA  Earth  Science  Plan.  Indeed  when  the  Congress  asked  the  Agency  for  a 
Science Plan in the NASA Authorization Act of 2005 (P.L. 109–155), you recognized 
that  the  Decadal  Survey  would  not  be  available  in  time  to  influence  the  Earth 
Science  portion  of  that  Plan.  Therefore,  NASA  was  asked  to  describe  how  it  might 
revise  that  Plan  based  on  the  Earth  Science  Decadal  Survey.  The  roadmapping  ac-
tivity and the Science Plan will address that question. 

While  the  scope  and  specificity  of  the  roadmap  clearly  must  exceed  that  of  the 
Decadal  Survey  and  must  accommodate  issues  of  programmatic  balance  and  na-
tional  needs,  it  is  definitively  not  our  intention  to  redo  the  Decadal  Survey  or  to 
change the scientific priorities that it identified. 

As  with  decadal  surveys  in  other  parts  of  the  Science  Mission  Directorate  port-
folio, this Decadal Survey is only the starting point for planning. However, planning 
in  Earth  Science  is  even  more  complex  than  in  other  divisions,  given  the  web  of 
partnerships  and  users  of  Earth  Science  data,  and  its  societal  impact.  Considering 
the  long  time  horizon  in  the  NRC’s  report,  it  will  require  several  budget  cycles  to 
implement  the  program  that  we  will  derive  from  the  Decadal  Survey’s  near-  and 
mid-term recommended mission sets. Nevertheless, our planning process starts with 
the  consensus  scientific  priorities  articulated  for  us  by  the  NRC.  So  I  will  close  by 
re-iterating  my  gratitude  to  the  decadal  survey  committee  Co-chairs  and  members 
for their excellent work. NASA’s commitment to Earth Science research is commen-
surate with theirs. 

Table 1.—NASA Earth Science Missions Currently in Development 

NPOESS Preparatory Project (2009) 
Strategic mission; Systematic measurement 

Landsat Data Continuity Mission (2011) 
Strategic mission; Systematic measurement 

Ocean Surface Topography Mission (2008) 
Strategic mission; Systematic measurement 

Glory (2008) 
Strategic  mission;  Initializes  a  systematic  measure-

ment 

Orbiting Carbon Observatory (2008) 
Competed mission; Earth System Science Pathfinder 

Ensures  continuity  of  several  key  climate  measure-
ments  between  the  Earth  Observing  System  and 
NPOESS.  Implementation  of  the  NPOESS  Presi-
dential  Decision  Directive  of  1994.  Joint  mission 
with the NPOESS Integrated Program Office. 

Ensures  continuity  of  long-term  global  land  cover 
change  data.  Post-LDCM  land  imagery  acquisition 
by  an  operational  agency  is  planned.  Joint  mission 
with USGS. 

Ensures continuity of ocean altimetry data; planned as 
part  of  a  transition  to  operational  agencies.  Joint 
mission with NOAA, CNES & EUMETSAT. 

Addresses  high  priority  objective  of  the  U.S.  Climate 
Change Science Program. Measure global aerosols & 
liquid  cloud  properties  and  solar  radiation.  Man-
dated  by  the  Presidential  Climate  Change  Research 
Initiative of 2001. 

Nearing completion of development. First global meas-
urement  of  CO2 from  space;  small  Earth  Science 
mission. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

14 

Table 1.—NASA Earth Science Missions Currently in Development—Continued 

Aquarius (2009) 
Competed mission; Earth System Science Pathfinder 

Global Precipitation Measurement (2013) 
Strategic  mission—Initializes  a  systematic  measure-

ment 

Earth System Science Pathfinder; TBD (2014) 
Competed mission 

In  advanced  stage  of  development.  First  global  meas-
urement  of  sea  surface  salinity  from  space;  small 
Earth  Science  mission.  Joint  mission  with  Argen-
tina. 

Recommended  by  2005  interim  report  of  decadal  sur-
vey committee; extend spatial coverage to global and 
temporal  coverage  to  every  3  hours  with  constella-
tion. 

Focus  and  relative  priority  to  be  determined  using 
decadal  survey;  solicitation  no  earlier  than  2008  for 
2014 launch. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF NANCY COLLETON,  PRESIDENT,  INSTITUTE FOR GLOBAL 
ENVIRONMENTAL STRATEGIES;  EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR,  ALLIANCE FOR EARTH 
OBSERVATIONS 

Introduction 

Chairman  Nelson,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  members  of  the  Committee,  spe-
cial  guests,  ladies  and  gentlemen,  I  am  Nancy  Colleton,  president  of  the  Institute 
for  Global  Environmental  Strategies,  a  non-profit,  501(c)3  organization.  Our  efforts 
are  devoted  to  furthering  knowledge  of  the  Earth  system  and  promoting  the  value 
and use of the technology tools that help us better understand our changing planet. 
The Institute’s efforts include everything from developing resources for K–12 science 
education and teacher professional development, to facilitating international cooper-
ative activities in Earth Science and applications. 

I  am  here  today  representing  one  of  our  major  initiatives,  the  Alliance  for  Earth 
Observations—an  informal  confederation  of  organizations  devoted  to  promoting 
Earth  observations  for  social  and  economic  benefit.  The  Alliance  has  been  a  strong 
advocate  of  the  importance  of  engaging  the  private  sector  (industry,  academia,  and 
non-governmental organizations) in the planning of Earth observation systems, pri-
marily the U.S. Integrated Earth Observation System (IEOS) and the multinational 
Global Earth Observation System of Systems (GEOSS). 

The Alliance membership is diverse and includes stakeholders such as system de-
velopers,  data  providers,  geospatial  technology  firms,  university-based  research  in-
stitutes,  and  a  non-governmental  organization  that  focuses  on  science  applications 
for  conservation.  Since  our  effort  began  in  December  2003,  we  have  implemented 
an aggressive outreach effort to numerous business sectors (e.g., clean technologies, 
energy, agriculture, public health) to raise awareness of the importance of Earth ob-
servations.  Attachment  A  includes  a  listing  of  the  Alliance  members.  An  Alliance 
Public  Policy  Statement  on  the  Decadal  Survey  for  Earth  Observations  is  included 
in Attachment B. 

We are here today to examine one of the most critical tools of Earth Science: sat-
ellite  observations.  Whether  we  realize  it  or  not,  we  all  work  in  the  field  of  Earth 
Science  and  benefit  from  satellite  observations.  Whether  you  are  a  policymaker,  an 
investor,  a  farmer,  a  fisherman,  or  a  truck  driver,  the  Earth  is  changing  and  it  is 
influencing our work, our decisions, our recreation, our resources, our economy, and 
our future. I am honored to participate in this important hearing, National Impera-
tives for Earth Science Research. 
Response to the Report 

The purpose of today’s hearing is to discuss the recent National Research Council 
report,  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space:  National  Imperatives  for  the 
Next Decade and Beyond. I thank Drs. Berrien Moore and Rick Anthes on the lead-
ership  that  they  have  provided  as  co-chairs  of  this  study.  I  congratulate  them  and 
the other members of the Decadal Survey Committee on this exceptional report. As 
we all know, the quality and breadth of reports such as this don’t just happen; they 
require a very dedicated and concerted effort. 

Quoting  from  the  report,  ‘‘the  United  States’  extraordinary  foundation  of  global 
observations  is  at  great  risk.  Between  2006  and  the  end  of  the  decade,  the  number 
of  operating  missions  will  decrease  dramatically  and  the  number  of  operating  sen-
sors  and  instruments  on  NASA  spacecraft,  most  of  which  are  well  past  their  life-
times, will decrease by 50 percent.’’ As my colleague, Governor Jim Geringer (former 
Governor  of  Wyoming)  pointed  out  in  his  testimony  on  this  topic  on  February  13th 
to the House Science and Technology Committee, ‘‘That means a fifty percent reduc-
tion  in  today’s  already  inadequate  space-based  information  systems.  . . .  It  is  dif-
ficult to maintain your vision from a crumbling vantage point.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

15 

I offer four primary observations to this Senate Committee for your consideration 

and deliberation: 

• The  fact  that  the  Decadal  Survey  Committee’s  vision  for  a  decadal  program  in 
Earth observations went beyond fundamental science to consider ‘‘increased ap-
plications  to  serve  the  Nation  and  people  of  the  world’’  is  a  significant  and 
much-needed shift in approach to the U.S. program. 
• The  U.S.  should  buildupon  our  space-based  Earth  observation  programs  and 
move forward with the U.S. IEOS—incorporating space, aircraft, and in situ in-
struments, and the requisite analytical capabilities. 
• Clear leadership is essential to resolve the issues and attain the goals identified 
in the Decadal Survey. 
• The time to act is now. 

Increased Applications to Serve the Nation and the World 

This  year,  we  will  celebrate  the  20th  anniversary  of  Our  Common  Future,  the 
groundbreaking  report  of  the  World  Commission  on  Environment  and  Development 
led by former Norwegian Prime Minister Gro Harlem Brundtland. The report begins 
as follows: 

In  the  middle  of  the  20th  century,  we  saw  our  planet  from  space  for  the  first 
time.  Historians  may  eventually  find  that  this  vision  had  a  greater  impact  on 
thought  than  did  the  Copernican  revolution  of  the  16th  century,  which  upset 
the  human  self-image  by  revealing  that  the  Earth  is  not  the  centre  of  the  uni-
verse. From space, we see a small and fragile ball dominated not by human ac-
tivity  and  edifice  but  by  a  pattern  of  clouds,  oceans,  greenery,  and  soils.  Hu-
manity’s  inability  to  fit  its  doings  into  that  pattern  is  changing  planetary  sys-
tems,  fundamentally.  Many  such  changes  are  accompanied  by  life-threatening 
hazards. This new reality, from which there is not escape, must be recognized— 
and managed. 
Fortunately, this new reality coincides with more positive developments new to 
this  century.  We  can  move  information  and  goods  faster  around  the  globe  than 
ever before; we can produce more food and more goods with less investment and 
resources;  our  technology  and  science  gives  us  at  least  the  potential  to  look 
deeper into and better understand natural systems. From space, we can see and 
study  the  Earth  as  an  organism  whose  health  depends  on  the  health  of  all  its 
parts.  We  have  the  power  to  reconcile  human  affairs  with  natural  laws  and  to 
thrive  in  the  process.  In  this  our  cultural  and  spiritual  heritages  can  reinforce 
our economic interests and survival imperatives. 

It  is  insightful  that,  even  in  1987,  world  leaders  recognized  that  not  only  would 
space  technology  help  us  understand  the  Earth,  but  that  it  could  also  be  a  unique 
tool to better manage our planet for social benefit and economic interests. 

But, it is disappointing that despite this powerful text published 20 years ago, we 
are  gathered  here  today  for  a  hearing  examining  the  decline  in  U.S.  space-based 
Earth observing capabilities. 

Since  that  time,  our  U.S.  systems  have  focused  primarily  on  answering  scientific 
questions,  with  applications  of  this  data  and  information  as  a  secondary  objective. 
And, although we have seen significant growth and impact of operational programs 
at the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) and the U.S. Geo-
logical  Survey  (USGS),  science  requirements  are  still  what  drive  the  development 
of our space-based systems. 

The  fact  that  the  Decadal  Survey  Committee’s  vision  for  an  Earth  observations 
decadal  program  went  beyond  fundamental  science  to  consider  ‘‘increased  applica-
tions  to  serve  the  nations  and  people  of  the  world’’  is  a  significant  step  and  much- 
needed shift in approach to the U.S. program. 

We  must  recognize  that  the  technologies  that  we  are  discussing  today  are  the 

same technologies that: 

• Enabled us to track and forecast Hurricane Katrina; 
• Enabled us to discover and visualize the ozone hole; 
• Allowed us to detect the impacts of the Indian Ocean tsunami and to determine 
• Continue to identify receding Arctic glaciers; and 
• Were used by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change in their studies. 
Just last week, we again witnessed the benefit of Earth observation satellite tech-

the true extent of the devastation it caused; 

nology to our nation: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

16 

• NOAA weather satellites provided critical lead time for the Southeast tornadoes 

(in some cases 12–55 minutes); and 

• NASA’s MODIS (Moderate Resolution Imaging Spectroradiometer) on the Aqua 
satellite enabled us to view the extent of dust storms caused by high winds over 
Northern  Texas  (Dallas  Morning  News  and  Houston  Chronicle  reported  that 
downed  power  lines  left  some  37,000  homes  and  businesses  without  power. 
Grass fires were also reported). 

The benefits of space-based data will not end this week or next. In fact, the need 
for  this  type  of  information  and  the  responsibility  of  the  United  States  as  a  world 
leader  to  maintain  and  share  this  important  capability  will  only  increase  with  the 
stress of climate change. 

In  a  January  12,  2007,  speech  to  the  World  Affairs  Council,  Lord  Levene,  Chair-
man  of  Lloyd’s,  provided  a  global  insurer’s  perspective  on  catastrophe  trends  and 
climate  change.  He  stated,  ‘‘We  cannot  risk  being  in  denial  on  catastrophe  trends. 
We  can  expect  to  see  U.S.  mega-catastrophes  with  $100  billion  insured  losses  soon. 
We  urgently  need  a  radical  rethink  of  public  policy,  and  to  build  the  facts  into  our 
future  planning.’’  He  added,  ‘‘The  insurance  industry  will  continue  to  play  a  vital 
role  as  enabler  and  rebuilder  of  the  U.S.  economy.’’  U.S.  satellite  assets  and  the 
products  provided  as  a  result  of  space-based  observations  are  critical  to  ensuring 
that insurance and other sectors have accurate and timely information. 

Not  only  should  the  United  States  strive  to  answer  key  scientific  questions,  but 
it  should  respond  to  the  needs  of  a  broad,  non-scientific  user  community,  which  re-
lies  increasingly  upon  operational  missions  by  NOAA.  By  this  I  mean  how  can  we 
ensure  that  our  national  research  program  and  technologies  are  meeting  the  needs 
of  policymakers,  state  and  local  water  managers,  energy  executives,  and  emerging 
areas such as the carbon finance market? This will involve additional study and pos-
sible  correction  of  our  current  research-to-operations  processes  based  on  new  en-
gagement  with  the  diverse  and  emerging  user  communities  to  provide  more  input 
to our national planning for new systems. 
Move forward with IEOS 

Former  Wyoming  Governor  Jim  Geringer,  who  testified  to  the  Senate  Commerce 
Committee  in  April  2006  on  drought  and  the  need  for  integrated  information,  also 
wrote  in  November  2006  to  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  to  express  the 
need  to  fund  IEOS,  the  U.S.  contribution  to  the  multinational  Global  Earth  Obser-
vation System of Systems (GEOSS). He wrote: 

Sir Francis Bacon coined the phrase ‘‘Knowledge is power.’’ Today it’s not about 
power  but  about  empowerment  as  our  country  faces  many  challenges.  More 
than ever we need better data-driven decisions. The first essential part is obser-
vation, the gathering of data. But we need more than data. Accurate and timely 
observations become information that leads to knowledge that enables decisions. 
We  must  reduce  uncertainty  to  enable  better  risk  management  for  businesses 
as well as protect citizens and save lives and property. 

In  the  December  2006–January  2007  issue  of  Environmental  Finance  Magazine, 
Vijay  Gudivaka  reported  that  ‘‘Companies  are  working  overtime  to  get  a  better  un-
derstanding of their environmental impacts.’’ The article discusses the need for more 
effective environmental data management and how companies are being challenged 
to  develop  data  bases  to  better  assess  environmental,  health,  and  safety  informa-
tion. Gudivaka writes, ‘‘Whatever system is being used to collect and distribute envi-
ronmental  information  needs  to  keep  meeting  the  requirements  of  the  business—or 
it has to change.’’ 

Without  an  established  information  infrastructure  that  builds  upon  our  space- 
based  Earth  observation  programs,  we  face  many  questions  currently:  Are  our  cur-
rent  systems  meeting  the  needs  of  our  businesses?  Are  our  current  systems  pro-
tecting  our  citizens  and  property?  . . .  maintaining  U.S.  competitiveness?  . . .  en-
suring  that  public  and  private  sector  decisionmakers,  have,  and  will  in  the  future 
have  the  information  they  need  to  respond  to  challenges  like  climate  change?  The 
Decadal  Survey  highlights  the  need  to  do  more.  My  work  with  numerous  business, 
academic,  and  non-government  leaders  also  reveals  that  our  systems  must  be  im-
proved to meet the requirements of business. 

Warren  Isom,  Senior  Vice  President,  Willis  Re  Inc.,  and  Board  Member  of  the 
Weather  Risk  Management  Association  remarked  at  the  Forum  on  Earth  Observa-
tions last year, ‘‘The weather risk market—in fact the risk-management business in 
general—has  a  profoundly  strong  interest  in  serious,  systematic  attempts  to  im-
prove, expand and intensify the capture of data relating to our planet.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

17 

The  current  U.S.  system  must  change  to  combine  and  integrate  the  valuable  and 
extensive information sources and tools across all Federal agencies. This would cre-
ate  the  IEOS,  new  interoperable  systems  that  enable  an  unprecedented  picture  of 
our world, with a better understanding of intended benefits. 

The  Alliance  for  Earth  Observations  believes  that  by  embarking  on  the  develop-

ment of IEOS that the United States will: 

• Give  its  citizens  the  single  most  important  and  comprehensive  technology  tool 
to  monitor  and  respond  to  our  changing  world,  thereby  protecting  lives  and 
property; 

• Give  its  Federal  leaders  and  managers  robust  observational  data  and  models 
that are fundamental to performance measurement, decision-making, and accel-
erating our understanding of environmental processes; 

• Provide  U.S.  industry  with  the  data  needed  to  better  manage  risk  and  re-
sources, make transportation decisions, create new business opportunities in en-
vironmental  information  products  and  services,  and  thereby  impact  long-term 
environmental sustainability; 

• Enable our country to remain the world leader in energy development and man-
agement,  agriculture  productivity,  marine  transportation,  public  health  and 
other areas; 

• Support  the  global  community  by  working  in  partnership  with  other  countries 

to share and integrate important data and information; and 

• Give future generations the knowledge and tools needed to leave a better world 

for each succeeding generation. 

IEOS  will  leverage  Earth  Science  and  technology  for  the  benefit  of  U.S.  citizens 
and  the  world.  In  the  area  of  climate  change,  IEOS  would  provide  accurate  and 
timely observations as the foundation for guiding U.S. climate change policy, ensur-
ing our Nation is moving in the right direction and providing the basis for knowing 
whether  our  policies  are  making  the  intended  positive  impacts  we  expect.  The  Na-
tional  Integrated  Drought  Information  System  (NIDIS),  which  is  a  key  component 
of  IEOS,  would  provide  a  proactive  solution  for  U.S.  citizens,  delivering  the  ‘‘busi-
ness intelligence’’ needed to manage the risk of drought. Regarding energy security, 
observations are critical to both the supply and demand sides of energy. On the sup-
ply  side,  all  sources  of  alternative  and  renewable  energy  are  highly  dependent  on 
environmental data. These energy resources include hydropower, wind, ocean energy 
(tide,  current,  wave),  biofuels,  photovoltaics,  and  geothermal  sources.  On  the  de-
mand  side,  environmental  conditions  largely  determine  the  overall  demand  for 
power as well as the variability in demand. By funding the IEOS, the United States 
would provide a new level of service to the American people to prevent, mitigate or 
manage  the  effects  of  natural  hazards  through  linked  and  interactive  systems  that 
provide  the  United  States  and  the  world  with  greater  forecasting  capability.  Even 
in the area of public health, IEOS would lead to: 

• Improved air quality forecasting; 
• Improved and earlier recognition of harmful algal blooms; 
• Earlier recognition of the need for beach closures; and 
• A national water quality monitoring system that, for the first time, would inte-
grate disparate water quality systems into one comprehensive system—a major 
step forward for the United States. 

IEOS  benefits  can  only  be  achieved  through  a  common  U.S.  integrated  informa-
tion  architecture.  The  benefits  discussed  in  the  previous  paragraphs  all  depend  on 
the  development  of  a  common  observation  and  information  system  architecture  for 
Earth  observations.  This  architecture  would  facilitate  information  sharing  between 
and  among  agencies  as  well  as  promulgate  standards  for  terminology,  data  dis-
covery,  data  access  and  transport,  and  service  interfaces.  This  approach  would  en-
able  our  investment  in  environmental  data,  products  and  services  to  be  leveraged 
by many communities of interest, generating value to both citizens and the economy 
through improved decisionmaking and incubation of a value-added market for envi-
ronmental products and services. A robust and scalable architecture for an environ-
mental enterprise would: 

• Leverage federally funded activities in other data-rich domains; 
• Enable  communities  of  interest  to  easily  and  transparently  access  a  variety  of 

thematically diverse and geographically dispersed assets; and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

18 

• Enable  any  group  or  organization  to  easily  connect  their  assets  into  the  enter-
prise  in  an  interoperable  fashion  without  significant  investment  in  information 
systems. 

IEOS  would  also  advance  the  Global  Earth  Observation  System  of  Systems 
(GEOSS),  which  is  now  supported  by  more  than  66  countries  and  46  international 
organizations. This U.S.-initiated effort is intended to allow Federal interagency and 
multi-national coordination to assure that disparate environmental-related data sys-
tems here at home and abroad are interoperable and compatible. An effective IEOS 
effort  should  have  clear  designation  of  responsibilities,  be  enabled  by  a  web-based 
system  that  allows  rapid  communication,  funded  across  agency  boundaries  with  a 
clear  purpose.  IEOS/GEOSS  would  improve  the  capabilities  for  today’s  decision-
makers  by  providing  new  information  products.  That  is  not  the  case  today.  IEOS 
has neither been funded nor has program leadership been designated. 
Clear Leadership Is Essential 

Clear  leadership  is  essential  to  resolve  the  issues  and  attain  the  goals  identified 
in  the  Decadal  Study.  The  report  before  you  calls  for  increased  funding  to  improve 
our current national Earth monitoring capability. Yes, funding is important but the 
essential  missing  element  is  leadership.  Scientific  assessment,  increased  budgets, 
improved  technical  capabilities,  and  coordinated  public-private  engagement  need 
designated,  consolidated  leadership.  Critical  elements  including  satellite  and  air-
craft sensors, in situ instruments such as stream gauges, and geospatial information 
systems,  have  been  fragmented  among  our  Federal  agencies,  always  a  secondary 
mission, never the priority responsibility. 

Earth observation is not a priority mission for any designated agency at the cabi-
net  level.  Not  within  NASA,  the  Department  of  Commerce,  the  Department  of  the 
Interior  nor  any  other  Federal  agency.  The  important  technologies  that  enable  us 
to  measure  climate  change  and  identify  and  monitor  the  impacts  to  our  environ-
ment,  our  lives  and  our  livelihood  are  the  sole  responsibility  of  no  one  agency  or 
person. 

Who should be the lead agency or position for U.S. Earth observation capabilities? 
What is our national vision for Earth observations? How are requirements from the 
Federal  operational  sector  such  as  NOAA,  USGS,  USDA  and  EPA  reflected  in  our 
research and development programs within NASA and NSF? Are requirements from 
the private sector being addressed? 

change; 

plans and budgets; 

Without a designated lead, we will not see: 
• These critical assets protected; 
• A  national  Earth  observations  strategy  that  appropriately  addresses  climate 
• The  required  investment  for  these  programs  appropriately  reflected  in  agency 
• Our national investment fully leveraged for societal and economic benefit; 
• The smooth transition from research to operations; 
• Our  land-observing  capabilities  elevated  to  the  level  of  atmospheric  and  ocean 
• An improved engagement between government and the private sector (industry, 
• The much-called-for integration of our national Earth observation systems; and 
• The products needed to make the best decisions for our country and future gen-

Academia, and non-governmental organizations); 

observations; 

erations. 

As a first step, I support the report’s recommendation that: 

The  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  in  collaboration  with  the  relevant 
agencies, and in consultation with the scientific community, should develop and 
implement a plan for achieving and sustaining global Earth observations. Then 
a single point of contact or program office at the Cabinet level should be estab-
lished to assure complementary rather than duplicative or fragmented effort for 
all operational aspects of Earth observation and analysis. 

I urge that the private sector—industry, academia, and non-governmental organi-

zations—be consulted regarding an integrated plan for Earth observations. 
Time To Act 

As we are often reminded, time passes quickly. 
In  preparation  for  this  hearing,  I  reviewed  numerous  reports,  one  of  which  is 
noted  earlier  in  this  testimony  and  is  entitled,  Linking  Remote  Sensing  Technology 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

19 

and Global Needs: A Strategic Vision. It was a report to NASA on applications. Iron-
ically, the vision outlined in this 1987 report was as follows: 

The vision for the future is an Applications Information System available to all 
users—whether  a  large  government  agency  or  small  local  firm—that  will  pro-
vide  overall  benefits  for  the  public  good  and  further  economic  interests  of  the 
United States. 

What  we  knew  20  years  ago,  what  the  Brundtland  Commission  acknowledged  in 
their groundbreaking report, and what we are reminded of today is that our nation-
ally-funded Earth Science and operational technology programs are vital to our soci-
ety and economy. If nothing else, I hope that the Decadal Survey will motivate you 
as policymakers and leaders to take action now—action to protect, leverage, and ad-
vance  these  assets  so  critical  to  protecting  our  nation,  the  world,  and  our  future. 
Let us not 20 years from now simply acknowledge the words written by the Decadal 
Survey  Committee,  but  rather  be  able  to  point  to  the  Decadal  Survey  as  a  turning 
point for action and commitment to protect, further develop, and exploit these assets 
for benefit of the Nation and the world. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

20 

The Alliance was formed in 2004 to facilitate participation by the private sector— 
industry, Academia, and nongovernmental organizations—in U.S. and international 
planning for Earth observations, especially as it relates to GEOSS. The Alliance for 
Earth  Observations  is  an  initiative  of  the  nonprofit  Institute  for  Global  Environ-
mental Strategies, a 501(c)3 nonprofit organization. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1

l
l

o
c
7
0
3

21 

The  Alliance  for  Earth  Observations  commends  the  work  started  by  the  National 
Research  Council  Space  Studies  Board  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Applica-
tions from Space in its recently released report: Earth Science and Applications from 
Space: National Imperatives for the Next Decade and Beyond. This important report 
sheds light on the declining Earth observation capabilities of the United States and 
lays out priorities for the next decade for Earth observations from space. This report 
offers  the  foundation  of  a  roadmap  to  bring  the  U.S.  Earth  Observation  capability 
in line with expectations for meeting the global change and climate policy challenges 
we  see  so  frequently  in  the  headlines.  Science  information  is  needed  to  inform  pol-
icy,  and  the  ‘‘Earth  Science  Decadal  Survey’’  as  this  report  is  called,  points  us  in 
the direction we need to advance our national capability into the 21st Century. 

The  members  of  the  Alliance  recognize  the  immense  value  to  society—both  in 
terms  of  economic  benefits  to  our  citizens  and  in  meeting  our  responsibilities  as 
stewards  of  our  environment—of  U.S.  programs  in  space-based  Earth  observations. 
The  Committee,  capably  led  by  Dr.  Richard  A.  Anthes,  President  of  the  University 
Corporation for Atmospheric Research and Dr. Berrien Moore III, Professor and Di-
rector of the Institute for the Study of Earth, Oceans, and Space, University of New 
Hampshire,  was  comprised  of  an  outstanding  team  of  subject  matter  experts.  In 
their report, they have provided a very valuable prioritization of scientific questions 
that need to be addressed along with recommendations for the space-based missions 
that should be developed and launched to provide the data needed to address impor-
tant societal issues—in the near, mid, and far term. 

The Alliance recognizes the challenge in the current budget climate of augmenting 
funding  for  multiple  agencies  charged  with  executing  the  Nation’s  operational  and 
research  Earth  observations  programs.  In  the  recently  released  President’s  Budget 
Request  for  Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2008,  funding  for  satellite  programs  at  the  National 
Aeronautics  &  Space  Administration  (NASA),  National  Oceanographic  &  Atmos-
pheric Administration (NOAA), and U.S. Geological Survey would not accommodate 
the  recommendations  of  the  report.  The  President’s  Budget,  if  enacted  in  FY–08, 
would  enable  NOAA  to  proceed  with  current  acquisition  plans  for  both  the  polar- 
orbiting  and  geostationary  satellite  programs,  with  their  now-reduced  instrument 
suites, and NASA to maintain momentum only on their current set of missions. The 
Alliance recognizes the importance of increasing U.S. Government funding to accom-
plish the recommendations in the report to advance our national Earth satellite pro-
grams. Funding would need to be implemented as top line budget increases, in order 
to not affect other important agency priorities. 

The Alliance agrees with the Decadal Survey and its predecessor reports from the 
National  Academy  of  Sciences  that  current  NOAA,  NASA,  and  USGS  budgets  and 
programs  do  not  include  the  programmatic  structure  needed  to  manage  the  re-
search,  development,  and  flight  testing  of  new  instrument  technologies,  and  subse-
quent  transition  to  operational  missions,  necessary  to  continue  to  evolve  U.S.  oper-
ational Earth observation capacity. Thorough technology demonstrations could have 
provided  the  risk  mitigation  needed  to  curtail  decisions  to  cancel  critically  needed 
climate  monitoring,  ocean  imaging,  and  advanced  atmospheric  sounding  instru-
ments  from  the  NPOESS  and  GOES–R  programs.  Future  plans  and  decisions  can 
benefit  from  the  report’s  recommendations  to  invest  in  developing  next  generation 
technologies and systems to reduce cost and schedule risks to operational programs. 
Implementation  of  the  report’s  recommendation  would  be  timely  in  addressing  this 
longstanding problem. 

The  Alliance  for  Earth  Observations  is  a  publicly  and  privately  funded  initiative 
of  the  Institute  for  Global  Environmental  Strategies  to  promote  the  understanding 
and use of land, air and sea observations for societal and economic benefit. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2

l
l

o
c
7
0
3

22 

Senator NELSON. So, Dr. Moore, do you consider the 17 missions 
recommended  in  the  survey  an  all-inclusive  wish-list?  Or  do  you 
consider  it  the  minimum  responsible  complement  of  the  measure-
ment tools? 

STATEMENT  OF  BERRIEN  MOORE  III,  PH.D.,  DISTINGUISHED 
PROFESSOR AND DIRECTOR, INSTITUTE FOR THE STUDY OF 
EARTH,  OCEANS,  AND  SPACE,  UNIVERSITY  OF  NEW 
HAMPSHIRE;  CO-CHAIR,  COMMITTEE  ON  EARTH  SCIENCE 
AND  APPLICATIONS  FROM  SPACE,  NATIONAL  RESEARCH 
COUNCIL, THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES 
Dr.  MOORE.  First  of  all,  Senator  thank  you  for  inviting  myself 

and my colleagues. 

I  think,  given  what  this  planet  is  faced  with—and  you  have  ar-
ticulated  that  well  this  afternoon—I  believe  it  is  the  minimal  re-
sponsible  recommendation  that  looks  at  the  challenges  facing  the 
planet. 

And  it  is  not  a  wish  list.  We  had  a  wish  list—there  were  110 
wishes  put  forth,  with  a  lot  of  enthusiasm.  And  we  cut  that  with 
NASA  receiving  15,  NOAA  receiving  3,  and  one  shared  jointly, 
making a total of 17. 

I  know  it’s  expensive,  but  I  believe  there  are  ways  that  one  can 
reach  back  to  that  restoration  of  $2  billion.  It’s  certainly  not  going 
to  be  done  in  1  year  or  5  years,  but  there’s  a  process  that  would 
be beneficial. I think it’s a reasoned response to the challenges. 

Senator  NELSON.  What  would  be  the  impact  if  only  a  fraction  of 

those 17 were implemented? 

Dr. MOORE. Well, that would depend upon which fraction. 
For instance, let’s suppose that we don’t go ahead with Synthetic 
Aperture  Radar  that  would  give  us  the  NSAR,  the  inframetric 
radar that gives us a much better understanding of earthquake po-
tential.  That’s  very  valuable  to  this  country,  and  very  valuable  to 
the planet. 

If  we  don’t  move  forward  with  the  recommended  Aerosol  Mis-
sion—we won’t be capable of making aerosol observations when for-
ests  are  burned,  releasing  tremendous  pollutant  loads  of  aerosols. 
Some  of  those  aerosols  actually  lead  to  global  cooling,  many  lead 
to  global  warming.  So  the  only  way  to  arrive  at  a  balance  is 
through observations of the aerosols. 

We recommended a CO2 mission that would be active, that is, by 
using a laser that could determine the sources and sinks of carbon 
dioxide,  all  around  the  planet;  all  seasons,  all  latitudes.  If  we’re 
going  to  manage  the  carbon  cycle,  we’ve  got  to  have  that  informa-
tion. If you give that up, then that’s not there. 

So, that’s why we looked across what we thought was the appro-
priate  suite—we  know  it’s  a  challenge.  We  know  it’s  a  challenge. 
And in this budgetary climate, it’s a very great challenge. But, the 
planet  is  facing  very  serious  issues  that  are  not  going  to  go  away. 
Earthquakes  are  not  going  to  stop,  hurricanes  are  not  going  to 
stop, global warming is not going to stop. 

Senator  NELSON.  What  specific  actions  do  you  think  should  be 
taken  to  improve  the  interagency  collaboration  on  Earth  Science 
missions that we seem to have had such difficultly with? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

23 

Dr.  MOORE.  Let  me  just  go  back  to  that  from  the  point  that  you 
raised,  that  we  have  seen  this  decline  in  the  NASA  budget.  And 
then  we  had  a  corresponding  increase  in  the  NOAA  budget  to  ac-
complish  the  NPOESS  and  the  new  GOESS.  Now,  we  have  a  per-
fect  storm.  We  lost  the  money  in  the  NASA  budget,  and  the  in-
crease  in  the  NOAA  budget  did  not  turn  out  to  give  us  what  we 
thought  we  were  going  to  get,  so  it’s  kind  of  a  lose-lose  situation. 
I  think  that  there  was  a  history  of  NASA  essentially  doing  the 
R&D  side,  including  the  oversight,  as  we  went  into  an  operational 
sensor.  It  cost  money,  but  NASA  has  the  talent—the  Goddard 
Space  Flight  Center,  for  instance,  has  the  talent  to  give  that  kind 
of independent, tough oversight. I’d like to see us move back to the 
system  that  we  had  in  place  that  brought  about  the  NPOESS  pro-
gram, and the earlier GOESS program. We had trouble back then, 
but not like today. 

Senator  NELSON.  Anybody  else  want  to  jump  in  on  that  set  of 

questions? Agency cooperation, collaboration? Dr. Freilich? 

STATEMENT OF DR. MICHAEL H. FREILICH, DIRECTOR, 

EARTH SCIENCE DIVISION, SCIENCE MISSION DIRECTORATE, 

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 

Dr. FREILICH. Sure. 
First,  let  me  say  thanks  to  Dr.  Moore,  and  all  of  the  rest  of  the 
people  on  the  Decadal  Survey  for  the  thoughtful  identification  of 
the  science  problems,  and  the  guidance  that  it  provides.  We  wel-
come the survey, in fact, we asked for it in 2003. 

We  take  the  survey’s  recommendations  very,  very  seriously.  In 
fact, in the Fiscal Year 2008 budget request—that’s before you—we 
are taking care in NASA of all of the precursor missions that were 
identified in the interim report, as well as the Decadal Survey. 

In  the  next  2  years,  we’ll  be  launching  five  key  climate  space-
craft, and two more after that, up through 2013. The two later ones 
are  the  Landsat  Data  Continuity  Mission  (LDCM),  and  the  Global 
Precipitation Measurement Mission—all of those were highly rated 
in the Decadal Survey. 

So,  we  take  that  guidance  extremely  seriously,  and  we  will  be 
taking  the  guidance  from  the  Decadal  Survey,  as  the  Administra-
tion puts together its Fiscal Year 2009 budget, and beyond. 

Relative to your question of interagency cooperation—it is a real 
challenge  for  this  country,  and  it  has  been  the  challenge  for  some 
time.  It’s  hard  enough  to  design  and  implement  and  fly  and  vali-
date  and  exploit  the  data  from  first  copies  of  instruments,  to  then 
be  able  to  do  an  interagency  transfer,  and  have  those  measure-
ments  taken  reliably  on  operational  spacecraft,  so  that  we  can  get 
the  30-year  climate  data  records,  which  are  essential—it’s  very, 
very difficult. 

In response, I believe to Congressional language in the 2005 Au-
thorization  bill,  NASA  and  NOAA  are  working  quite  hard  to-
gether—we  have  a  joint  working  group  specifically  focused  on  re-
search  to  operations  transition.  While  it  is  a  challenge,  and  we 
haven’t  solved,  certainly,  all  of  those  problems,  or  even  many  of 
those  problems,  I  think  we  are  strengthening  the  relationship  be-
tween  those  two  agencies.  I’m  new  in  this  job  at  NASA,  but  it  is 
certainly  one  of  my  very  strong  objectives,  and  a  high-priority  ob-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

24 

jective,  for  us  to  work  much  more  efficiently,  much  more  sub-
stantively together. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  since  you  are  relatively  new  to  this  posi-
tion, I welcome you to get in and try to straighten out some of the 
problems between NASA and NOAA, and NPOESS includes the Air 
Force, as well, doesn’t it? 

When Dr. Griffin was here last week, he questioned whether the 
Decadal  Survey’s  cost  estimates  are  too  optimistic.  Is  NASA,  Dr. 
Freilich,  going  to  do  its  own  estimates  of  the  recommended  mis-
sions, and share the results with everybody else? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  Yes.  We  are  embarking  on  an  aggressive  series  of 
what we call concept studies, to look very, very carefully at the no-
tional  missions  that  were  endorsed,  especially  the  early  ones,  the 
highest-priority  ones,  from  the  Decadal  Survey.  The  objective  of 
these  studies  is  to  use  the  full  costing  and  engineering  analyses 
machinery of the NASA centers—JPL and Goddard, in particular— 
to address and understand the technological challenges inherent in 
getting the measurements that were identified by the Decadal Sur-
vey, and the full costs of these missions, including the launch vehi-
cle, and especially, also, the science and the validation. 

We’re  moving  aggressively  forward  on  that  now,  now  that  we 
have  the  Decadal  Survey’s  exact  recommendations  in  terms  of  the 
measurements  to  be  taken.  When  we  have  those  engineering  and 
cost  analyses,  we  will  much  better  be  able  to  generate  an  inte-
grated  road  map  forward,  taking  into  account  the  high-priority 
science  that  was  identified  by  the  Decadal  Survey,  the  issues  of 
NPOESS,  and  the  removal  of  the  climate  instruments  pursuant  to 
Nunn-McCurdy,  that  you  so  eloquently  discussed.  And  the  con-
tributions, interest and expertise of our international partners. So, 
we intend, within the next 12 to 15 months or so, to have an inte-
grated, well-understood, road map forward to make progress. We’ve 
done  the  precursor  missions—or  I  should  say,  we  are  finishing  the 
precursor missions, and then we’ll be in a position to move forward 
on  the  high-priority  science  that  the  Decadal  Survey  guides  us  to-
ward. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  when  do  you  think  those  cost  estimates 

would be available to the Committee? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  We  are  working  on  them  now,  and  we  are—as  I 
said,  looking  carefully  at  each  one  of  those  notional  missions,  also 
understanding  what  we  need  to  do,  and  can  do,  to  mitigate  the 
NPOESS  climate  problem.  And  I  think  in  some  months—probably 
less than 6 months, we will have a fairly clear idea of the true full 
costs of those notional missions. 

Senator NELSON. Dr. Brown, you—OK, I’ll get to Ms. Colleton in 
just  a  second—Dr.  Brown,  you’ve  had  some  excellent  testimony 
about Earth Science satellites, and Ms. Colleton. I want to ask you 
all about the impact of this research. 

STATEMENT OF OTIS D. BROWN, PH.D., DEAN, ROSENSTIEL 

SCHOOL OF MARINE AND ATMOSPHERIC SCIENCE, 

UNIVERSITY OF MIAMI; MEMBER, COMMITTEE ON EARTH 

SCIENCE AND APPLICATIONS FROM SPACE, 

NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL, THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES 
Dr. BROWN. Thank you, Senator. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

25 

Let  me  step  back  for  a  minute,  and  talk  about  a  bit  of  history 
here,  and  it  will  frame  my  answer  a  little  better,  I  think  relative 
to impacts. 

The history from the seventies, eighties and nineties, is that each 
Earth Science community approached NASA individually, and said, 
‘‘OK,  as  oceanographers,  we  need  this,’’  ‘‘As  meteorologists  or  at-
mospheric  scientists,  we  need  this,’’  ‘‘As  land-cover,  land-use  peo-
ple, we need this,’’ ‘‘As climate scientists, we need this.’’ And NASA 
tried its best in the Earth Observing System to respond in an inte-
grated way to all of these different ideas, requests and needs. 

The Decadal Survey was very different, in the sense that, as has 
happened  in  astronomy  and  other  disciplines  with  NASA,  NASA 
asked  the  community,  ‘‘You  know,  you  guys  are  all  Earth  Sci-
entists, why don’t you get together and give us your best set of in-
tegrated priorities, rather than us having to decide what the prior-
ities  should  be  of  everything  you’ve  asked?’’  That’s  a  fundamental 
difference, and this downsizing of more than 100 different possibili-
ties  to  the  order  of  less  than  20,  is  a  result  of—I  wouldn’t  say 
smoke-filled  rooms,  not  these  days—but,  you  know,  a  lot  of  hard 
negotiation  about  saying,  ‘‘How  is  it  that  we  can  really  get  the 
highest  priority  needs  of  the  broad  community  on  the  limited  set 
of missions?’’ 

So,  this  is  a  different  set  of  mission  requests  than  anything 
NASA  has  ever  seen  before.  But,  it  had  to  be  built  on  a  base,  and 
this  gets  into  the  impacts.  The  base  is  what’s  in  space  now,  the 
Earth Observing System and a number of other prototype research 
missions  that  are  flying,  things  that  have  to  do  everything  from 
trying  to  measure  tropical  rain  rates,  to  surface  vector  winds— 
many different, very unique sorts of missions. 

But all of these missions are neither research or operational real-
ly.  In  most  cases,  they  were  launched  as  research  missions,  but 
they  found  operational  niches  within  the  government  and  private 
industry, not only in this country, but globally. 

And  so,  we’re  in  an  interesting  situation.  How  do  we  sustain 
these research missions that now have operational needs? Whether 
it’s  for  trying  to  better  locate  a  hurricane,  or  it’s  trying  to  better 
understand  issues  of  drought  or  rain  run-off  and  floods  in  tropical 
regions.  All  of  these  results  are  coming  out  of,  what  you  would 
think,  looking  at  the  title  of  the  mission,  was  a  research  mission, 
not an operational one. 

So,  that’s  a  problem.  There  hasn’t  been  a  real  functional  mecha-
nism  to  say,  ‘‘OK,  we  know  it  works,  now  how  do  we  put  it  into 
a broader operational context?’’ 

So,  one  of  the  zero-order  challenges  for  the  Decadal  Survey  was, 
what’s the foundation you build the future on? That’s why—as you 
look  at  the  high-priority  missions,  you  might  get  what  you  think 
is a bit of a mixed message, because you hear people talking about 
NPOESS  and  climate  sensors  coming  off  of  NPOESS  and  so  on, 
and  in  fact,  as  you  look  at  the  projected  set  of  missions  from  the 
Decadal  Survey,  it  doesn’t  really  give  you  a  simple  answer  to  that 
question. 

So, let me address the impacts. Impacts, I think, can be direct— 
operationally  now,  we’re  using  surface  vector  winds  from  various 
different  missions,  actually,  most  all  of  them  research,  and  in  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

26 

hurricane  community  they’ve  been  shown  to  improve  forecasts. 
Case  in  point—tropical  rainfall  measuring  from  space.  Again,  this 
is a capability that has had a strong impact. 

I  think  you  could  say  that  as  you  look  at  the  breadth  of  this 
whole  suite  of  missions  from  the  mid-nineties  to  the  early  part  of 
this  millennium,  that  many  of  them  have  been  moved  into  this 
quasi-operational  context.  But  that  context  sits  between  what 
NASA has traditionally done, and what NOAA does, as its charter. 
So  that’s,  why  you  won’t  get  a  totally  straightforward  answer  to 
your  question.  I  think  it’s  demonstrable  what  can  be  done  from 
space,  it’s  demonstrable  how  long,  I  think,  it’ll  last,  but  it’s  the 
‘‘Then  what?’’  question.  And  quite  directly,  in  the  Decadal  Survey, 
we had to assume at the outset that NPOESS was going to happen 
on  a  certain  timescale,  with  a  certain  implementation  suite,  and 
then go from there. 

And, I’d invite the co-chair, if he’d like to comment on this it was 
a  very  interesting  and  detailed,  long-term  debate  within  the  sur-
vey,  actually,  about  how  to  deal  with  a  moving  NPOESS  suite  of 
capabilities. 

Senator  NELSON.  Let  me  ask  Ms.  Colleton,  what  do  you  think? 

thank you. 

STATEMENT  OF  NANCY  COLLETON,  PRESIDENT,  INSTITUTE 
FOR  GLOBAL  ENVIRONMENT  STRATEGIES;  EXECUTIVE 
DIRECTOR, ALLIANCE FOR EARTH OBSERVATIONS 
Ms.  COLLETON.  I  just  wanted  to  make  two  points,  my  apologies, 

I  just  wanted  to  make  two  points  in  reference  to  the  Decadal 
Survey. The first is that, I think what is most significant about the 
vision of the Decadal Program that was adopted by this committee 
that  is  primarily  scientists,  is  that  it  went  beyond  looking  just  at 
fundamental  science,  and  it  looked  at  applications  for  the  good  of 
the Nation, and the world. And, I think this is a real much-needed 
shift as we see more and more private sector entities using this in-
formation. We’re seeing new developments in our information tech-
nologies, that are making this information available to more people 
than ever before. Think of Google Earth, think of Microsoft Virtual 
Earth—and those are just the beginning. We will be able to access, 
and  manipulate,  and  have  decision-support  tools  like  never  before, 
in the future certainly. 

So,  I  think  it’s  very  important  to  recognize  the  essential  part  of 
applications.  And,  I  agree  with  Dr.  Brown,  totally.  When  you  look 
at,  just  for  example,  the  TRIMM  mission,  the  Tropical  Rain  Meas-
urement mission—that mission is going on its 10th year, I believe. 
It  started  out  as  a  research  mission,  it  was—its  success  criteria 
was 3 years, it’s now in its 10th year. And it’s very, very important 
to our hurricane forecasting. And it was some time ago—I think it 
was  2  years  ago—that  there  was  question  as  to  whether  NASA 
would  continue  to  fund  the  operation  of  TRIMM,  and  NOAA  was 
saying, ‘‘But, we need those measurements for the upcoming hurri-
cane season.’’ 

And  so,  there  are  going  to  continue  to  be  those  kinds  of  issues, 
until we have a clear research-to-operations transition plan for the 
Nation, which brings me to my second point. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

27 

I  think  one  of  the  things  that  has  not  been  addressed  by  the 
Decadal  Study  that  I  really  believe,  as  a  country,  we  need  to  look 
at—and  that’s  leadership.  We  recognize  more  and  more  how  vital 
these  systems  are  to  our  livelihood,  our  property,  saving  lives,  I 
mean—being from Florida, you know well the importance of hurri-
cane  forecasting,  and  we  still,  you  know,  we  see  the  kind  of—the 
fact  that  we  were  able  to  evacuate  90  percent  of  Southeast  Lou-
isiana  with  40  hours  advance  notice  with  Katrina.  That’s  better 
than we have ever been able to do. 

But,  I  believe  that  that  transition  where  this  information  is  no 
longer  just  available  to  the  science  community,  but  it’s  becoming 
more  operational  all  the  time,  and  we  have  our  economy,  is  using 
this  information  and  relying  on  this  information  more  and  more.  I 
think  it  calls  for  a  new  look  at  how  we’re  doing  these  programs, 
and  leadership.  Without  leadership,  these  programs—the  budgets 
for them—will never be protected. And, there will never be a long- 
term  vision  for,  as  a  Nation,  for  what  we  should  be  doing  in  this 
area. 

Senator NELSON. Dr. Moore? 
Dr. MOORE. Yes, let me pick up on that point. And, we had a spe-
cific  recommendation—I  should  mention  that  the  recommendation 
that  we  initially  debated  was  how  to  reorganize  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment,  and  we  recognized  we  must  be  late  in  the  days  of  the 
Committee to be reorganizing the Federal Government. 

And  so  we  stepped  back  from  that.  And,  and  yet  the  motivation 
was  precisely  what’s  being  stated—if  you  look  at  the  way  we’ve,  if 
you  will,  managed  the  Earth-observing  business  in  the  United 
States, it has a checkered history. 

Now,  take  Landsat—it’s  been  all  over  the  place—the  only  place 
it’s  not  been  is  the  Senate  of  the  United  States—it’s  been  in  the 
Air  Force,  it’s  been  in  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey,  it  went  over  to 
NOAA,  back  to  NASA,  back  over  to  NOAA,  back  to  NASA—this  is 
observing land surface where people live. This should not be tossed 
around the Federal Government. 

The  situation  with  NPOESS,  clearly  the  lessons  will  be  learned 
for many painful years. So, what we set forth was the fact that we 
felt  that  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  has  a  unique 
opportunity  in  the  next  2  years,  in  an  Administration  which,  by 
definition,  will  not  succeed  itself.  As  far  as  I  know,  the  Vice  Presi-
dent  is  not  running  for  President.  So,  you  are  almost  in  an  apo-
litical  time  for  OSTP.  I’m  from  New  Hampshire,  we’re  not  in  an 
apolitical time in New Hampshire—but it is a different scenorio for 
OSTP  to  sit  down  with  NASA  and  NOAA  and  the  U.S.  Geological 
Survey,  with  the  Congress,  and  with  the  community  and  with  the 
private  sector,  and  say,  ‘‘What  could  we  advise  the  incoming  gov-
ernment  in  2008,  to  do  about  this  Earth  observing?  Let’s  see  if  we 
can’t get this thing on a more rational footing.’’ It is not easy. 

I  think  the  primary  problem  is  that  the  capabilities  of  agencies 
do  not  necessarily  line  up  with  their  responsibilities.  I  think  that 
is exactly where we have this problem with NOAA. Their responsi-
bility  was  for  this  next-generation  weather  satellite.  But  they  did 
not,  necessarily  have  internal  capabilities  to  manage  something  of 
that complexity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

28 

So,  I  believe  we’re  going  to  have  to  really  rethink  the  way  in 

which we do business. It’s just not working. 

Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Freilich,  what  about  the  expected  gap  be-
tween  Landsat  7  and  the  Landsat  Data  Continuity  Mission?  What 
is going to be the scientific impact of that gap? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  I’m  not  a  land  scientist  myself,  in  fact,  I’m  an 

oceanographer, like Otis Brown here. 

However,  we  have  looked,  and  are  continuing  to  look  quite  care-
fully  at  that.  Climate  time  series  are  things  to  be  cherished,  it 
takes  30  years  to  get  a  30-year  continuous  data  set.  We  are  inves-
tigating  with  our  international  partners,  what  other  data  sources 
might be available for the relatively short amount of time between 
the potential demise of Landsat 7, and the plan for launch and op-
eration of Landsat Data Continuity Mission, which will be in 2011. 
There  are  many,  many  other  countries  which  are  flying,  or  plan 
to  fly,  land-observing  missions.  Not  all  of  them  at  the  same  level 
of  radiometric  accuracy,  many  of  them  at  the  same  level  of  spatial 
resolution,  and  coverage,  as  we  have.  So,  we  are  actively  dealing 
in  NASA  with  our  international  partners,  to  try  and  assemble,  as 
best  as  possible,  a  data  set  of  land  observations  to  enable  the  cli-
mate  science  to  continue,  and  to  enable  this  time  series,  which 
we’ve  invested  so  much  in  as  a  Nation,  to  continue  to  be  able  to 
serve the climate science, as well as other communities. 

Senator  NELSON.  By  the  way,  if  we  didn’t  have  enough  to  worry 
about,  the  Chinese  now  have  the  capability  to  knock  down  sat-
ellites. 

Let  me  ask  Dr.  Moore,  are  the  new  missions  that  are  currently 
in  NASA’s  pipeline,  such  as  the  Landsat  Data  Continuity  Mission, 
Glory,  and  NPP,  are  they  consistent  with  the  Decadal  Survey  rec-
ommendations? 

Dr. MOORE. Yes, they are completely consistent. 
And,  I  think  that  NASA  had  the  interim  report,  which  was  re-
leased in April of 2005, as a basis to build the 2008 report. The in-
terim budget dealt with the existing programs—Landsat Data Con-
tinuity,  Glory,  so  forth,  the  ones  that  you’ve  mentioned.  And  we 
said, ‘‘We really need to get these on track,’’ and the 2008 and 2009 
budgets do that. 

NASA  did  not  have,  in  preparation  of  the  2008  budget,  the  final 
report  of  the  Decadal  Survey,  which  looked  at  the  out-years,  be-
yond  the  existing  programs,  which  the  2008–2009  really  address. 
And  as  a  consequence,  if  we  look  at  the  run-out  that,  after  2009, 
things go negative again. 

I’m  hopeful  that  Dr.  Freilich  leadership  and  with  Alan  Stern 
coming  in,  that  in  the  2009  budget,  we  will  see  that  run-out  turn 
around,  because  the  real  recommendations  of  the  Decadal  Survey 
deal  with  these  new  missions  that  are  the  absolute—they  are  the 
ones  that  are  dead  critical,  in  terms  of  the  problems  that  the 
Decadal Survey was looking at, whether it was earthquakes or cli-
mate  or  severe  weather  or  droughts  or  greenhouse  gases.  They’re 
the ones that address those issues. 

Senator NELSON. Dr. Brown? 
Dr.  BROWN.  Two  answers.  One,  as  Dr.  Moore  said,  the  interim 
report  jumpstarted  the  internal  processes  within  NASA,  so  that 
they can address that particular suite of issues, including GPM. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

29 

The  outstanding  problem,  though,  that  is  unaddressed—at  least 
from  my  perspective  right  now—is  the  loss  of  climate  sensor  capa-
bility on NPOESS. We don’t have an answer to that problem, in ei-
ther agency right now. 

Senator  NELSON.  Are  any  of  those  projects  what  you  would  con-

sider a lower priority? 

Dr.  BROWN.  No.  Actually,  in  terms  of  the  Decadal  Survey,  no. 
And  as  you  might  imagine,  there  were  a  lot  of  hard  negotiations 
that occurred to come up with that list. And there was a consensus 
across  the  panels  on  the  final  list,  that  these  really  were  the  -pri-
ority  missions  that  needed  to  be  looked  at  in  the  next  decade.  So, 
I’m on board with those, sir. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  let  me  ask  to  any  of  you,  if  the  Earth 
Science  Program  were  to  proceed  along  the  current  path,  which  is 
the  bare-bones  NPOESS  and  only  the  new  missions  in  the  NASA 
pipeline,  what  are  the  risks,  explain  to  our  Committee,  to  our  Na-
tion’s coastal areas? 

Dr.  BROWN.  The  risks  are  multi-fold,  some  would  happen  sooner 
rather  than  later,  Senator.  The  longer-term  risks  are,  you’ll  have 
interruptions of climate quality data records in a number of areas, 
so  you’re  going  to  lose  continuity  and  have  to  restart  climate 
records  that  you  really  don’t  want  to  lose,  which  are  fundamental 
to look at long-term changes. For example, there are input solar ir-
radiance  versus  earth  radiation  coming  out,  and  understanding 
aerosol impacts. Those would be areas that could be at risk. 

Similarly  you  could—as  you  look  at  some  of  the  other  climate- 
quality instruments on the NPOESS suite, see interruptions in the 
climate part of the record. 

The  other  part,  which  is  the  direct  impacts  has  to  do  with  the 
slips in NPOESS, what is that going to mean to polar orbiter, visi-
ble and infrared mapping coverage of the globe. We don’t know that 
yet,  because  we  don’t  know  what  that  interval  might  be.  But,  if 
there is some interval, with much-reduced coverage, that’s going to 
undoubtedly have societal impacts, because that’s a primary sensor 
for many different sorts of warnings that might be put out. 

An  area  that  I  would  specifically  focus  on  has  to  do  with,  as  we 
look  at  sea  level  rise  globally,  and  all  of  the  aspects  that  go  into 
observing and forecasting it. It includes such esoteric things as try-
ing  to  map  out  polar  ice  extents—and  thickness,  and  so  on.  Which 
parts  of  those  capabilities  that  will  be  diminished  is  going  to  have 
an  impact,  as  we  try  to  look  at  sea  level  rise?  It’s  going  to  mean 
errors,  the  error-bounds  or  our  confidence  in  estimating  these  will 
change, for example. Thank you. 

Senator  NELSON.  Ms.  Colleton,  what  do  you  think?  How’s  this 
going  to  affect  ordinary  Americans?  Not  necessarily  on  the  Coast, 
but if you want to talk about the Coast feel free. 

Ms. COLLETON. Well, I think one of the important things that we 
have  to  consider  is  if,  if  there  is  a  question  about  our  space  capa-
bility  in  the  future,  we  have  to  look  at  other  options.  And,  we’ve 
yet  to  talk  about  aircraft  and  in  situ  measurements,  and  how  im-
portant  those  are.  And  one  of  the  things  that,  clearly  we’re  begin-
ning  to  start  is  the  implementation  of  the  Integrated  Ocean  Ob-
serving  System,  and  all  of  the  regional  associations  across  the 
country  that  do  coastal  monitoring,  et  cetera.  There  was  money  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

30 

the  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  to  begin  that  process,  I 
don’t  think  it’s  enough  money,  but  programs  like  that  will  grow  in 
importance,  if  those  space  capabilities  are  not  available.  And  I 
think  they—and  the  fact  that  we  need  to  look  at  more  of  the  inte-
grated information between space, aircraft, and in situ information, 
and  develop  an  integrated  Earth  Observing  System  that  would 
have all of those capabilities, is very, very important. 

Senator NELSON. Just as an aside, one of the aircraft capabilities 
of NOAA is the G–4 that flies at 40,000 feet plus, and tracks hurri-
canes.  It’s  given  them  a  15  percent  greater  accuracy  in  prediction 
of  hurricane  paths,  with  the  resulting  additional  early  warning. 
That’s  a  single-point  failure,  we  don’t  have  a  backup  aircraft.  And 
I’ve  been  trying  to  beat  the  door  down  for  the  last  several  years 
about, ‘‘Well, you only need it for 6 months of the year, try to figure 
out  when  and  where  another  agency  could  use  it  for  the  other  6 
months. You can share it.’’ But, I just spoke to the number two guy 
at  NOAA,  and  they’re  not  going  to.  They  don’t  have  any  plans  to 
come forward and request this. It’s just another indication of what 
you said, Ms. Colleton. 

Ms.  COLLETON.  And,  again,  I  think  it  elevates  the  importance  of 
taking  a  comprehensive  look—not  just  at  our  space  programs,  but 
our  U.S.  common  information  infrastructure  that  we’re  using,  the 
in  situ  measurements  we  have,  and  aircraft.  And  looking  to  have 
someone  responsible  within  our  government  to  look  at  the  whole 
picture,  and  determine  if  it’s  appropriate  or  accurate  for  the  chal-
lenges that we face. 

Dr. MOORE. Senator, could I just elaborate? 
Senator NELSON. Please, please. 
Dr.  MOORE.  The  question  that  you  asked—if  we  didn’t  go  ahead 
with  the  recommendations  of  the  Decadal  Survey,  and  we  are  liv-
ing  with  the  highly  reduced  NPOESS  program,  what  would  be 
some of the things that you wouldn’t have? Well, we wouldn’t have 
good  measurements  of  ice  sheets.  We  know  that  ice  sheets  are 
changing. We know the changes in ice sheets lead to changes in sea 
level. So, we would not have that. 

Second,  we  wouldn’t  have  good  measurements  of  sea  level.  One 
of  the  missions  that  we  recommend  deals  with  instruments  that 
not  only  will  measure  sea  level,  but  will  also  measure  lake  levels, 
as well as major rivers. We wouldn’t have that information. 

In the GOESS program, they have eliminated the Coastal Waters 
Imagery.  In  the  Decadal  Survey,  we  recommended  a  mission  that 
would  not  only  handle  coastal  waters,  but  also  air  pollution,  the 
measurement of air pollution. 

So, when you start down the list, I think the coastal communities 
are living right at the tipping point. And the recommendations that 
we’ve  made  were  looking  very  much  at  the  issue  of,  what  are  the 
applications? Who are the people at risk? 

Soil  moisture—this  is  a  major  issue  for  coastal  areas.  There  will 
be  far  less  capability  on  the  NPOESS  mission  than  was  planned. 
One of the missions that we recommended was to directly measure 
soil moistures. 

So,  I  think  that  we’ve  tried  to  identify  priorities  by  looking  at 
these  critical  populations,  and  certainly  the  coastal  community  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

31 

amongst  the  most  critical  population,  particularly  viewed  world-
wide. 

Dr. FREILICH. I would just like to point out that we presently are 
flying  14  Earth-observing  satellites.  We’ve  talked  a  bit  about  sea 
level,  and  that  is  certainly  one  of  the  triumphs—we  have  accurate 
measurements of global sea level that started with the TOPEX-Po-
seidon  joint  NASA-French  Space  Agency  Program.  Presently,  the 
Jason-1  altimetry  mission  is  flying,  and  the  very  first  of  the  new 
missions  that  are  in  the  budget  to  launch—and  it  will  launch  in 
2008—is  a  yet  another  follow-on—the  Ocean  Surface  Topography 
Mission.  So,  we  have  focused  on  very,  very  high  priorities,  and 
ocean  surface  topography,  at  least,  is  one  global  time  series  which 
is  going  to  continue  at  extremely  high  accuracy,  with  good  overlap 
between sensors. 

Senator  NELSON.  Ms.  Colleton,  how  do  state  and  local  govern-

ment use the data from these satellites? 

Ms. COLLETON. They use it in a variety of ways. I think probably 
the  best  example  is  in  looking  at  drought,  the  drought  monitor 
that’s  available,  you  know  we’re  experiencing  a  terrible  drought 
right  now  in  Texas,  and  last  week  alone  there  were  terrible  dust 
storms,  35,000  homes  and  businesses  without  power,  as  a  result. 
But,  the  satellite  data  is  put  into  systems,  information  systems, 
that allow anyone, anywhere to access it. They can do this through 
the  University  of  Nebraska  at  Lincoln,  go  to  the  drought  monitor 
and  determine  what  the  outlook  is,  what’s  currently  happening, 
what the outlook might be for a few weeks ahead. 

So  it’s  not  only  with  drought.  One  of  the  most  exciting  things 
that  we’re  beginning  to  see  in  the  area  of  applications  is  the  rela-
tionship  between  environmental  information,  and  public  health. 
And again, it’s just an emerging thing. But we can look, for exam-
ple,  at  malaria,  and  look  at  parts  of  the  world,  for  example,  that 
may have characteristics that might promote the next malaria out-
break. How is that helpful? Because it helps NGOs get medicine to 
certain parts of the world, producers to distribute it, et cetera. 

One  other  area  that  I  think  will  be  very,  very  important  with 
emerging applications of remote sensing, or satellite Earth observa-
tions  is  that  we—again,  we’re  just  beginning  to  look  at—is  the  ap-
plication of this information to the carbon finance market, and how 
this  technology  becomes  an  innovation  for  climate  change.  We’re 
looking  at  renewable  fuels,  we’re  looking  at  emission  reductions, 
but  are  we  looking  at  Earth  observations  and  how  it  can  be  used? 
I  mean,  for  one,  for  example,  just  in  monitoring,  it  will  show  us 
whether  or  not  our  policies  are  working.  So,  I  think  for  state  and 
local government leaders, this information has a lot of applications. 
Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Freilich,  why  don’t  you  give  us  some  com-
mentary  on  why  you  think  NPOESS  has  had  so  many  problems? 
What has NASA learned about the structure, so we can apply it to 
future collaborations? 

Dr. FREILICH. An excellent question, Senator. 
NPOESS  is  a  step  forward  from  the  Earth  Observing  System 
that  NASA  was  flying  and  from  the  operational  weather  satellites 
that  NOAA  and  the  Department  of  Defense  separately  had  been 
flying, and are flying right now. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

32 

In  some  instances,  the  instruments  that  were  anticipated  to  fly, 
or  that  were  chosen  to  fly  on  NPOESS  were  quite  mature,  and  we 
had  built  them,  NASA  had  often  demonstrated  their  capabilities, 
and their utility, and they transitioned well. 

For instance, on the NPOESS Preparatory Project, one of the in-
struments,  the  so-called  ATMS,  Advanced  Technology  Microwave 
Sounder  instrument,  is  in  good  shape.  The  technology  is  moving 
along,  it  was  mature,  it  is,  in  fact,  already  integrated  onto  the 
spacecraft. 

In  some  other  areas,  I  think  that  corporately,  we  were  reaching 
rather far. We were attempting to get to the next generation of in-
struments  to  fly  on  an  operational  spacecraft,  when  perhaps  we 
had  not  fully  examined  the  technology,  and  the  implementation 
issues  associated  with  them  in  the  context  of  research  missions. 
Historically,  NASA  did  the  research  missions,  as  you  heard  pre-
viously  from  my  colleagues.  Many  of  our  research  satellites,  vir-
tually all of them, provide data in near-real-time. And, those meas-
urements  originally  flown  for  research  purposes,  when  they  dem-
onstrate their utility, are then used routinely in operational numer-
ical weather forecasting, marine hazard warning, et cetera. 

So,  that  was  the  process  that  we  had,  and  I  think  that  we 
jumped  a  little  bit,  perhaps,  in  our  eagerness  to  get  a  truly  out-
standing  operational  constellation  of  instruments.  And  in  my  per-
sonal  opinion,  that  is  not  quite  the  way  we  had  shown  it  in  the 
past, and the way in which we had experience. 

Senator NELSON. Do you think it can meet its revised cost sched-

ule and technical goals? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  NASA  is  a  partner  in  the  NPOESS  program  as  a 
technology  provider.  In  the  short  time  I’ve  been  here,  I’ve  not  had 
the  time  to  study  the  details  of  where  we  are  in  NPOESS  as  a 
whole.  I  think  that  the  Nunn-McCurdy  recertification  focuses 
NPOESS  on  its  weather  forecasting  capabilities,  and  based  on  the 
analyses that went into that, we will be able to achieve those capa-
bilities, that performance. 

As far as climate goes, I think that the Nunn–McCurdy re-certifi-
cation  is  fairly  honest,  and  it  says  that,  given  the  resources  that 
are available, we should not be focusing on climate measurements, 
and therefore, we as a country have to look at how to mitigate the 
removal of those measurements. It’s not that we shouldn’t focus on 
climate,  but  this  program  can’t  afford  to  focus  on  climate.  We 
should  look  to  see  how  to  mitigate  the  impact  of  removing  those 
sensors,  but  get  the  measurements  flown  in  different  ways.  And, 
we’re  actively  working  with  NOAA  and  other  portions  of  the  gov-
ernment  through  OSTP,  in  particular  to  try  to  come  up  with  miti-
gation strategies. That will feed into our integrated road map that 
I talked about previously. 

Because, the science and the societal impact that were identified 
in the Decadal Survey really requires a background context, if you 
will,  of  measurements  that  we  had  thought  were  going  to  be  ob-
tained  from  NPOESS,  and  if  they’re  not  obtained  from  NPOESS, 
we still have to make those measurements in order to advance our 
Earth-system science. 

Senator  NELSON.  Are  there  particular  problems  that  you  think 

we ought to be on the lookout for? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

33 

Dr.  FREILICH.  Sorry,  I  don’t  quite  understand  the  question, 

whether it’s—— 

Senator  NELSON.  In  the  revised  cost  schedule  and  technical 
goals?  Do  you  think  we  can  meet  them  all,  or  are  there  going  to 
be some problems that we ought to be looking for? 

Dr. FREILICH. Every space mission that I’ve been associated with 
and  that  I’ve  known  about,  has  had  challenges  associated  with  it. 
There  are  clearly  two  instruments  on  the  NPOESS  preparatory 
project—the VIIRS instrument and the CRIS instrument, which at 
the  moment,  represent,  quite  significant  technological  challenges. 
They  are  not  NASA-provided  instruments,  I  might  point  out,  but 
they’re critical instruments for the science that has been identified, 
and  for  the  societal  impact  that  we  would  like  to  extract  from  this 
national investment. 

Senator NELSON. Do you think the NPP will fill the gap between 

EOS and NPOESS? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  NPP,  as  well  as  international  partner  contribu-
tions,  in  particular,  EUMETSAT  and  the  MetOp  series  of  space-
craft, and the instruments and spacecraft that we have in the Fis-
cal  Year  2008  budget  will  bridge  the  gap.  Those  seven  missions 
that  I  talked  about  that  will  launch  out  between  2008  and  2013 
which, by the way, not only includes the Ocean Surface Topography 
Mission, but also the orbiting carbon observatory that Ms. Colleton 
talked  about,  which  is  also  going  to  launch  in  2008.  Those  mis-
sions—and  the  ones  that  we’re  flying  now—will  certainly  not  only 
continue,  but  expand  the  range  of  variables  that  we’re  presently 
measuring,  and  then  the  question  just  becomes  a  programmatic 
one, of when the follow-ons take place. Now that we have the clear 
guidance from the Decadal Survey, we can begin to build those in-
tegrated programs. 

Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Moore,  you  want  to  talk  to  us  about 
projects  that  were  dropped  from  NPOESS,  and  tell  us  what  you 
think  about  the  status  of  them,  then  Dr.  Freilich,  why  don’t  you 
comment  on  that  and  to  what  degree  you  think  you’re  going  to  be 
able to get them in the budget? 

Dr.  MOORE.  Well,  there  are  several.  I’ll  begin  with  the  less  ex-
pensive  ones.  Perhaps  they  could  come  back  into  the  budget  via 
NOAA. And these are very important for climate. 

The  total  solar  irradiance  monitor—this  monitors  the  solar  out-
put—was  dropped.  And,  the  instrument  to  measure  the  energy 
coming off of the planet was dropped. Now, if you’re going to do cli-
mate  work,  the  concern  about  climate  is  the  change  in  the  energy 
balance,  because  of  the  greenhouse  gases.  You’ve  got  to  have  the 
total solar irradiance, and you’ve got to have the energy coming off 
the  planet—those  are  of  the  first  order.  The  Decadal  Survey  rec-
ommended  those  back  to  NOAA  because  we  felt  that—not  only 
were  they  important,  but  they  were  not  budget  breakers.  In  fact, 
I  think  it  would  probably  be  in  the  noise  of  the  uncertainty  about 
the  NPOESS  budget.  So,  that  would  be  a  very  clear  recommenda-
tion. 

The  other  was  the  altitude  distribution  of  ozone  in  the  atmos-
phere.  That  was  eliminated—they  were  going  to  continue  to  meas-
ure  the  total  amount  of  ozone  in  the  column  of  air,  but  not  see  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

34 

detail,  the  altitude.  We  really  need  to  understand  that.  So  those 
are three things that we felt could be put back on the NOAA side. 
On  the  other  aspects,  it  appears  that  there  will  probably  be  far 
less capability of measuring soil moisture. And therefore, one of the 
early recommendations to NASA was a soil moisture mission. Now, 
this  is  a  good  example  of  where  I  think  a  NASA  mission  does  not 
fulfill the NOAA and Air Force responsibility. This would be a sci-
entific  mission,  but  there  will  have  to  be  the  capability  of  taking 
the data from this scientific mission and incorporating that into the 
operational side of NOAA and the Air Force. 

What  worries  me,  is  that  in  the  reduction  of  the  budget  for 
NPOESS, there will be a loss of that capability to utilize that data 
for operational purposes. So, we’re recommending a wide swath al-
timeter, to look at ocean altimetry, sea level height, as well as riv-
ers  and  lakes.  The  altimeter  was  lost  from  the  NPOESS  mission. 
This  is  a  recommendation  to  NASA,  but  once  again—will  there  be 
the capability of utilizing this data? 

Finally,  the  NPOESS  mission  was  advertised,  and  still  is  adver-
tised, as not only a weather mission, but a climate mission—the in-
struments  are  said  to  have  climate  capability,  that  means  that 
they’re  very  stable,  they  make  a  very  precise  and  accurate  meas-
urement. 

Well,  the  NPOESS  program  has  something  they  call  ‘‘weather 
centrals.’’  These  are  the  places  that  the  data  is  processed  for 
weather prediction purposes. Where’s the climate central? In order 
to produce climate data records, as Mike Freilich said very well, to 
produce  these  long  time  series,  they  require  data  that  is  often  re-
processed  three,  four,  five  times.  The  reason  for  that  is,  instru-
ments age—(just as we age)—and performance changes. So, as the 
instrument  changes,  the  algorithms  that  process  the  data  need  to 
be changed. The algorithms need, for climate signals, to be the very 
best we can get—not the fastest. For weather purposes, speed is ev-
erything.  So,  where’s  the  climate  central?  Despite  our  very  clear 
recommendation  in  the  interim  report,  and  again  in  the  final  re-
port,  we’ve  never  had  NOAA  respond  to  that.  Yet,  if  you’re  going 
to have a climate mission, you need to produce climate data. 

So,  first  of  all,  I  think  there  are  serious  issues  with  respect  to 
the instruments. Second, we’ve tried to make a recommendation to 
NOAA  on  these  energy  balance  issues—some  of  the  measurements 
that we’ve recommended to NASA are high-priority measurements, 
third,  there  will  still  be  the  cost  of  ingesting  this  data,  and  finally 
there’s the issue of the climate central. 

Senator NELSON. What do you think, Dr. Freilich? 
Dr.  FREILICH.  OK,  let  me  go  down  the  list  that  Dr.  Moore  pre-

sented. 

We’ve  already  talked  about  ocean  surface  topography  and  altim-
etry, the OSTM mission will be launching in 2008. Dr. Moore men-
tioned the radiation balance, and in particular, the total solar irra-
diance.  The  Glory  mission,  which  we’ll  launch  at  the  end  of  cal-
endar  year  2008,  is  in  the  final  stages  of  implementation  now.  It 
has  two  instruments  on  it.  One  of  them  is  an  aerosol  polarimetry 
sensor,  but  the  other  is  a  total  solar  irradiance  sensor.  So,  that 
mission is funded, will be launching at the end of 2008, or the very 
beginning  of  2009—and  that  will  continue  that  extremely  impor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

35 

tant  time  series.  Which,  by  the  way,  requires  absolute  overlap  of 
the  measurements.  We,  unfortunately  are  not  in  a  position  where 
we  can  build  total  solar  irradiance  instruments  which  have  suffi-
ciently  good  absolute  accuracy  to  tolerate  a  gap.  But,  we  have  a 
TSI, a Total Solar Irradiance instrument, which will launch on the 
Glory mission, and that one is good. 

As  far  as  the  Earth  Radiation  budget  instrumentation,  the 
CLARREO  mission,  as  Dr.  Moore  pointed  out,  is  a  joint  set  of 
measurements  between  NASA  and  NOAA.  It  is  one  of  the  poten-
tially  lower  cost  missions,  we’re  looking  at  it  carefully,  and  cer-
tainly  one  of  the  high-priority  science  ones,  and  we’ll  be  looking 
very  carefully—it’s  one  of  the  four  earliest  missions  that  the 
Decadal  Survey  recommended,  and  we’ll  be  looking  very  carefully 
and  be  guided  by  the  Decadal  Survey,  as  I’ve  said  many  times,  in 
putting together our integrated plan. So, it’s going to be quite high 
up, in our focus early on. 

Senator NELSON. And what year do you think that will come in? 
Dr.  FREILICH.  I  can’t  say  right  now,  because  we  have  to  put  the 
plan together, and it has to account—as I said before—for all of the 
measurements  that  are  required  to  advance  the  science.  We  need 
to  be  able  to  balance  the  resources  that  are  available  with  all  of 
the  measurements  that  we  need,  including  the  new  measurements 
for the Decadal Survey science, such as soil moisture, and the con-
text  measurements  that  would  have  been  provided  by  NPOESS, 
had  it  gone  as  expected.  So,  as  in  so  many  other  things  that  we 
do—and as is emphasized so strongly in the Decadal Survey, where 
they  talk  about  balance  between  disciplines,  and  balance  between 
research  and  flight  projects,  and  balance  between  airborne  and  in 
situ  measurements—we  have  to  deal  with  balance  for  the  Nation, 
certainly,  for  NASA,  and  inside  the  Earth  Science  Division.  But 
that’s the whole point of our integrated roadmap, which we are em-
barked  on  right  now,  given  the  clear  objectives  that  have  been  set 
out by the Decadal Survey. 

I  might  also  point  out,  sir,  if  I  can,  that  the  Fiscal  Year  2008 
President’s  budget  requests  funding  for  a  mission—a  competitively 
selected,  unspecified  Earth  Systems  Science  Pathfinder  mission— 
that  is  a  medium-sized  mission  and  will  launch  in  approximately 
2014.  As  part  of  our  integrated  roadmap,  we  are  taking  that  line 
into  account.  So,  I  think  that,  an  answer  to  your  question  is  that, 
when  we  put  the  integrated  roadmap  together,  there  is  money  in 
the  President’s  budget  for  a  medium-sized  mission  to  launch  in 
2014,  and  the  question  is,  precisely  what  scientific  focus  should  it 
have? 

Senator  NELSON.  Would  it  consider  the  other  two  that  were  left 
off,  for  the  measurement  of  the  soil  moisture  and  for  the  altitude 
distribution of ozone? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  Let  me  deal  with  them  separately.  The  altitude 
distribution  of  ozone  is  a  relatively  small  and  relatively  mature 
technology  that  we  have.  In  fact,  the  total  ozone  and  the  atmos-
pheric  profile  were  supposed  to  be  two  instruments  originally,  but 
that  were  closely  linked  to  each  other,  and  we  will  look  very,  very 
carefully at getting that one flown rapidly. 

That  is  not  in  the  same  class  of  investment  technology,  or  any-

thing else that we’re talking about for the other ones. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

36 

In terms of soil moisture, there are a number of possibilities that 
were  laid  out  in  the  Decadal  Survey  and  they  dovetail,  actually, 
fairly  well  in  some  cases  with  the  Global  Precipitation  Measure-
ment  Mission.  And  we’re  looking  carefully,  as  I  keep  saying,  at  an 
integrated approach to make the best use of the resources that we 
have—so that if we can, in fact, overlap some of these and kill mul-
tiple  birds  with  fewer  stones,  we’re  looking  very,  very,  carefully  at 
doing that. 

NASA’s contributions to the Global Precipitation Mission has two 
parts  to  it.  The  first  is  a  core  spacecraft,  joint  with  our  Japanese 
Space  Agency  partners,  that  will  have  a  couple  of  different  instru-
ments  on  it—an  active  precipitation  radar,  and  a  passive  radiom-
eter.  That  will  launch  in  2013.  In  2014,  however,  this  budget  line 
includes the so-called GPM Constellation spacecraft, which we need 
in  order  to  get  the  good,  accurate  global  precipitation  measure-
ments, that GPM as a unit, is intended to provide. 

However, the radiometer that is on that spacecraft may, perhaps, 
be  able  to  be  adapted,  enhanced,  whatever—I  don’t  want  to  do  de-
sign  in  front  of  the  Senate,  in  fact,  I’m  not  even  capable  of  doing 
design  in  my  office,  being  an  oceanographer.  However,  those  are 
the  sorts  of  questions  that  we’re  asking  ourselves,  as  we  put  to-
gether the integrated roadmap—how best to get the measurements 
that  we  need  that  advance  the  science  with  the  resources  that  we 
have available. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  what  about  the  idea  of  weather  centrals 

becoming climate centrals, as Ms. Colleton mentioned? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  I’m  not  sure  that  I  heard  that  weather  centrals 
should become climate centrals, what I heard Ms. Colleton and Dr. 
Moore  say,  was  that  capability,  that  function,  must  be  recognized 
as  scientifically  and  societally  very  important.  NASA,  in  general, 
does  not  do  that  sort  of  work,  because  that’s  an  operational  kind 
of capability. However, we really, really need it in order to advance 
both the science and the societal impact. 

Senator  NELSON.  Ms.  Colleton,  do  you  want  to  expand  on  that? 
Ms. COLLETON. I think that Dr. Moore said it appropriately. 
Senator NELSON. Turn on your mike. 
Ms. COLLETON. Sorry—I’ll learn by the time this hearing is over, 

to turn on my microphone, I apologize. 

But,  I  think  Dr.  Moore  said  it  accurately—the  way  that  the 
NPOESS  program  is  structured  right  now,  there  is  this  focus  on 
weather  centrals,  that  rely  and  push  for  speed  in  delivery,  where 
the climate centrals aren’t being considered at this point, and those 
require more sensitive types of instrumentation, and processing. 

Is that correct, Dr. Moore? 
Dr. MOORE. I think that, the weather centrals have their job, and 
it’s  best  to  let  them  focus  on  that  job.  A  climate  central  needs  a 
different  oversight,  a  different  scientific  oversight,  it  requires  ad-
vanced  computing—as  does  the  weather—but  perhaps  it  should  be 
structured  differently,  and  separated  from  the  task  of  the  weather 
centrals. 

Our  concern  is  that,  right  now,  it’s  not  in  the  budget,  it  doesn’t 
appear  to  be  in  the  planning,  speaking  to  NOAA,  and  I  do  not  see 
any  way  to  simply  try  to  piggy-back  it  on  something  else.  I  think 
it’s a very serious enterprise, and it’s not being addressed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

37 

The other comment I wanted to make was when I addressed the 
issue  on  the  solar  monitoring  and  so  forth—I  was  taking  into  con-
sideration  that  NASA  on  the  Glory  mission  gets  us  to  about  2013 
with  this  solar  monitoring.  But  then  it  stops,  because  it’s  deleted 
from the NPOESS mission. So, our recommendation is that, it’s not 
expensive,  it  is  highly  important,  as  Mike  said,  you’ve  got  to  have 
it  overlap  with  whatever  is  on-orbit  at  that  time,  making  that 
measurement,  because  you  need  to  get  a  consistent  time  series. 
And  therefore,  it  was  natural  to  put  it  on,  put  it  back  on  the  first 
NPOESS spacecraft. 

But,  it  requires  resources.  And  what  I’m  afraid  of  is,  the 
NPOESS situation is not in closure yet, and we may see additional 
pressure on the program, and therefore there will not be the ability 
to  respond  to  these  very  real  needs  that  we’re  going  to  have.  And 
I  just  don’t  see  how  they’re  going  to  be  met,  unless  things  change. 
Dr.  BROWN.  Senator,  a  final  comment  from  me  on  that.  Let’s, 
and,  go  back  to  the  earlier  discussion  that  we  had  on  the  Decadal 
Survey  committee.  And  that  was  that,  you  know,  should  you  re-
structure  the  Federal  Government  to  deal  with  these  challenges  of 
the NPOESS program? 

What  you  see,  though,  is  when  restructuring  had  to  happen  be-
cause  of  Nunn-McCurdy,  there  was  no  climate  sponsor  to  step  up 
and  say,  ‘‘That’s  my  responsibility  I  want  to  preserve  that.  Here’s 
a  budget  to  do  that.’’  That,  I  think,  is  a  fundamental  issue  as  we 
move  into  this  new  suite  of  satellites.  Who  is  going  to  be  the  cli-
mate sponsor for Earth Observing Systems? I don’t know what the 
answer is. I’m not going to presume that, but I do think that is the 
question. 

ma’am? 

Senator NELSON. Any further comments from any of you all? Yes, 

Ms. COLLETON. If I could, we’ve spent a lot of time talking about 
NPOESS  this  afternoon.  But  I  think,  again,  we  have  to  consider, 
NPOESS  is  supposed  to  go  through  2024,  and  are  we  considering 
what  follows?  Or,  are  some  of  these  missions  that  are  getting  set 
back  longer  and  longer  times.  Again,  I  would  call—I  would  hope 
that  you  would  call—for  a  long-term  strategy  for  Earth  observa-
tions. We do not have one. We do not have a national strategy, we 
need  to  address  these  climate  questions,  it’s  imperative,  and  I 
would hope that you would call for such an action. 

Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Moore,  you  were  about  to  say  something? 
Dr.  MOORE.  Yes,  one  final  comment—I  recognize  that  when  we 
put  forth  17  missions,  and  say  we  need  to  get  back  to  the  year 
2000,  that’s  a  major  step.  We  could  have  classed  those  missions, 
grouped  them  into  three  large  spacecraft,  and  said  we’re  only  rec-
ommending  three  missions.  We  thought  we  were  recommending  a 
more robust strategy by breaking it up. 

So,  let’s  think  about  how  we  might  exploit  that  robust  strategy. 
Mike Freilich has spoken, I think, very positively, we all appreciate 
it  in  the  community—about  the  Decadal  Survey.  Let’s  see  if  we 
can’t find a way to actually embrace it, beyond these road-mapping 
exercises.  And  so,  what  I  would  like  to  suggest  is,  we’ve  rec-
ommended 17 missions to NASA. Let’s look at the first six or seven 
of  them.  Let’s  start  with  them.  Say,  $10  million  a  year  for  seven 
missions to do the kind of detailed cost analysis, do the kind of de-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

38 

tailed  high  technological  risk  parts,  the  so-called  ‘‘tall  poles’’—let’s 
start working those right now. 

So,  $70  million  to  take  on  the  first  seven—what  would  happen? 
Well, first of all, we would all join forces in the community because 
we would see a positive response. The country, I think, would begin 
to feel positively too, that we’ve got this thing back on track. Indus-
try would look at this and say, ‘‘Well, Earth Science is a place that 
we  need  to  put  our  industrial  money.’’  I  know  the  industry,  quite 
often  will  say,  ‘‘Well,  if  NASA’s  going  to  invest  ‘‘X’’  number  of  dol-
lars,  we  need  to  invest  that,  because  we’re  competing  against  our 
peers  out  here.’’  So,  when  you’re  in  a  hole,  the  first  thing  you  do 
is stop digging. Instead we would start to dig steps out of the hole. 
So,  by  making  that  kind  of  investment—$70  million  is  a  lot  of 
money, but in other ways, it’s not a lot of money. 

Senator NELSON. Anything from you all for the record? 
Dr. FREILICH. Thank you very much. 
Senator  NELSON.  Well,  thank  you  for  your  time.  I  did  not  intro-
duce  you  all,  we  just  started  right  in  on  our  conversation.  Dr. 
Freilich  is  the  Director  of  the  Earth  Sciences  Division  of  the 
Science  Mission  Directorate  at  NASA,  Dr.  Moore  is  Director  of  the 
Institute  for  Study  of  Earth,  Oceans,  and  Space  at  the  University 
of New Hampshire, Dr. Brown is the Dean of the Rosenstiel School 
of Marine and Atmospheric Science at the University of Miami, and 
Ms.  Colleton  is  the  President  of  the  Institute  for  Global  Environ-
mental Strategies, and is the Executive Director for the Alliance for 
Earth Observations. So, you all have added mightily to our knowl-
edge,  and  our  attempts  to  try  to  get  this  right.  So,  thank  you  very 
much. 

The meeting is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 4 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:27 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\78568.TXT JACKIE

